


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













neah power systems inc, Shopping.net











































Top Category Matches



> Rechargeable & Replacemen...




> Network Hub & Switches




> UPS & Power Adapters




> Other Fitness Equipment




> Other Holiday Decor




> Audio / Video Cables & Ad...




> Computer Cables & Adapter...




> Miscellaneous Non-Fiction Boo...




> Electrical Supplies




> Bridges & Routers




> Power Supplies




> Car Audio / Video Accessories




> Law Books




> Audio & Video Accessories




> Boats, Kayaks & Boating E...




> Miscellaneous Automotive




> Miscellaneous Home & Gard...




> Swimming Pools & Spas



see all categories













Price



Price must be rounded to nearest dollar
$

to $







Free Shipping







Genre







Action Adventure

17






Fighting

8



 more












Color







Black

8



 more












Motherboard Form Factor







ATX

9



 more












Networking Type







Ethernet

33



 more












Publisher







Activision

17



 more












Networking Connection Type







Ethernet

53






Gigabit Ethernet

17






Fast Ethernet

12






USB

10






IEEE 802.3af

8






IEEE 802

8



 more












Switching Protocol







Ethernet

29



 more












RAM Type







SDRAM

15



 more












Hard Drive Interface Type







Ultra DMA/ATA-66

8



 more












Platform







PC

15



 more















Shop by Department



Appliances




Automotive




Babies & Kids




Clothing & Accessories




Computers & Software




DVDs & Videos




Electronics




Gifts, Flowers & Food




Health & Beauty Supplies




Home & Garden




Jewelry




Musical Instruments & Accessories




Office Supplies




Other Products




Pet Supplies




Sports Equipment & Outdoor Gear




Toys




Video Games




 See more































Royal Sovereign Int'l Inc 0.9 Cu. Ft. 1000...
$447.60
$248.51














Power Systems 61916 CardioBarbell - 10 Set Rack...

$294.93














Power-Turn Lateral Rotation Mattress System w/...

$5,600.37














Power-Turn Lateral Rotation Mattress System w/...

$5,230.77













Power Systems 80187 Club Foam Roller Cart

$208.01













Power Systems 91205 4 lbs VersaBar 4 ft....

$21.45













ROHO, Inc. SAHYOVMATT109 HybridSelect Mattress...

$3,259.50













Cisco CP-PWR-7925G-NA 7925G AC Power Supply for...

$31.99













Hubbell Wiring Systems S1SPTRAC System One...
$80.91
$58.50













Generac Power Systems Inc 6346 Power Inlet Box...
$94.99
$89.80













Hubbell Wiring Systems S1SPMAX System One Siemon...
$99.12
$49.50













Hubbell Wiring Systems S1SPEXT2 System One...
$70.97
$44.50













ABLEGRID AC / DC Adapter For RCA Visys...

$21.88













PwrON AC to DC Adapter For Topcon GRS-1 GRS-I...

$35.99













Oncore Power Systems Inc. Pc6-01F-Blk-S Cat6...
$11.02
$4.32













Generac Power Systems Inc. Oil Heater Kit

$108.99













Coleman Cable Systems Inc. 041602 1500J 7 Out...
$28.14
$25.32













PwrON New AC TO DC Adapter For Sys Technology...

$28.99













ABLEGRID AC/DC Adapter For Sys Technology Inc...

$24.88













ABLEGRID 48V Global AC / DC Adapter For Cisco...

$7.98













Chief X-large Fusion Video Conferencing Cart...

$1,999.99













"CISCO PWR-IE3000-AC Expansion Power...

$261.28













"NComputing L300 Virtual Thin Client System...

$179.99













"CISCO PWR-3900-AC 3925/3945 AC Power...

$382.87













"CISCO PWR-60W-AC 880 Series AC Power...

$29.99












1


2


3


4


5


6


7


8


9


10


>






































Privacy


Terms of Service


Contact Us


Shopping.net is compensated by these merchants. Payment is one of several factors used to rank these results. Tax and shipping costs are estimates.
© 2017 IAC Publishing, LLC




























Neah Power Systems | leading innovator of unique energy solutions

















































 






Neah Power Systems is a leading innovator of unique energy solutions.
Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB:NPWZ) is a developer of innovative, long-lasting, efficient and safe power solutions for the military, transportation, and portable electronics applications. Neah uses a unique, patented and award winning, silicon-based design for its Powerchip(R) technology that enable higher power densities, air and non-air operation, lower cost and compact form-factors. Neah uses patent pending low cost, differentiated technology for its BuzzBar™  and BuzzCell™ micro fuel cells for its consumer oriented products.

Award Winning Technology
Neah Power’s ideas and products have been awarded; 2012 ZINO Green finalist, 2010 WTIA finalist, and 2010 Best of What’s New™ Popular Science, Office of Naval Research Award, Red Herring Top 100 Innovators Winner, NIST Award and more.
> Learn more about Products here.
Growing World-Wide Markets
Neah Power develops unique and disruptive new technologies for growing world-wide opportunities including the Military, First Responders, Logistics and Consumer Electronic and Mobile markets.
> Learn more about Markets here.







 
Search



Financial Update New Proxy Form Def 14A
  Recent News 

NEAH POWER SYSTEMS WINS U. S. Department of Energy grant for lithium metal battery
August 23, 2016


NEAH POWER SYSTEMS Battery Proposal Selected As Semi-Finalist
July 8, 2016


NEAH POWER SYSTEMS SUBMITS PROPOSAL FOR DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY FUNDING
June 7, 2016


NEAH Power systems ISSUES Letter to Shareholders – March 2016
March 16, 2016


NEAH POWER SYSTEMS INVITED TO WHITE HOUSE BRIEFING
February 16, 2016


 Neah on Twitter Tweets by @neahpowerinc

 
























Power Chip | Neah Power Systems










































Neah Power’s Patented PowerChip™ Technology
At the heart of many of Neah Power’s products is the PowerChip—a dynamic new patented energy technology. Neah Power develops products utilizing the PowerChip for military, government and corporate clients, to exacting specifications that solve specific power requirements and integrate into custom applications.  Neah’s PowerChip technology is a viable source of reliable energy across diverse industries. Contact us for more information.



























Markets | Neah Power Systems









































Neah Power provides innovative energy solutions for multi-billion dollar industries around the world.










Mobile Energy
Consumers on-the-go are demanding more energy and longer batter life for mobile computing. The BuzzBar and associated family of products is well suited extend the capability of a variety of consumer products.
> Learn More
 


Military
Combat and communication troops around the globe need lighter and more powerful energy sources. Unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs) and unmanned underwater vehicles (UUVs) operating in unpredictable environments require longer mission capability to meet the constantly evolving needs. Neah’s PowerChip and BuzzCell technologies are uniquely positioned to serve these markets.
> Learn More


First Responders
Emergency responders need to have mobile power in disaster areas without interruption. Neah’s PowerChip and BuzzCell technologies are uniquely positioned to serve First Responder needs.
> Learn More 
 


Logistics
Cordless hand-held devices make logistics faster and easier. Longer lasting mobile power solutions are critical for businesses of every size to create competitive advantages and meet industry demands.
> Learn More 
 































First Responders | Neah Power Systems










































Neah brings the power when First Responders need it most.
First responders need reliable and long-lasting communications, sensors, and other portable electronics devices. Police, fire, and other first responder personnel often operate in environments where power is unavailable for long periods of time. Their reliance on communications and related devices is absolute and often a matter of life or death.
First responder devices require a dependable, lightweight, compact power source to extend operational run-times. In addition, the electronic equipment and power sources need to be able to perform reliably under harsh operating conditions in the field.
Neah Power’s patented silicon-based fuel cell is expected to address these fundamental issues and provide a superior power source for diverse first responder applications.
Instant “Recharge” for continuous computing.
Importantly, first responders can benefit from the ability to continuously run their electronic equipment without the need to wait for recharging. Fuel cells can produce power as long as a fuel source is provided. When one fuel cartridge is exhausted, it can simply be replaced by another one to continue the power supply. Instead of carrying multiple batteries, first responders would only need to carry one fuel cell and several lightweight fuel cartridges for continuous power capability.
Fully Sealed System
Neah Power’s design can be configured as an open air system (for greater runtime capacity) or as a fully-sealed system (for predictable operation under a wide variety of field conditions). Both configurations capture the reaction by-products inside the fuel cartridge. The open-air system requires exposure to air for its oxygen source, while the fully-sealed system contains a liquid oxidant alongside methanol fuel in the cartridge.



























Management | Neah Power Systems









































Neah Power Management and Corporate Governance
Neah Power System’s Management Team brings a wealth of experience and hands-on development to the energy, fuel cell and technology sector.
Management
Dr. Chris D’Couto | President and Chief Executive Officer
Dr. D’Couto brings more than fifteen years of sales, marketing and product development experience to Neah Power. In his previous roles of increasing responsibility at Intel Corporation, Novellus Systems and FormFactor Inc. he was responsible for the introduction of new disruptive products that are critical to the success of these companies. Dr. D’Couto is the primary author of various patents, has published extensively in peer reviewed journals, and has been the invited keynote speaker at various forums. He has a Ph.D. in chemical engineering from Clarkson University, NY, and an MBA from the Haas School of Business, University of California, Berkeley.
 
Derek Reiman | Director of Manufacturing
Mr. Reiman has extensive experience in all aspects of Neah’s proprietary technology, and has had roles of increasing responsibility in development, manufacturing, process transfer and system development. In his current role as Director of Manufacturing, Mr. Reiman is responsible for the silicon processing, production, cell and stack testing and quality control, and is working with the outsourced manufacturing supply chain to enable world class competitive products. Mr. Reiman has a B.S. in Metallurgical Engineering, with a focus on semiconductor processing, from the University of Washington.
Board of Directors
Jeffrey B. Sakaguchi | Chairman of the Board Member
Jeffrey Sakaguchi has served on our board since November 2010. Mr. Sakaguchi has served since 2009 as the Chairman of the Board of Directors of the American Red Cross, Greater Los Angeles Chapter where he has been responsible for the financial and organizational turnaround of chapter performance. From 2004 until 2007, Mr. Sakaguchi served as the President and Chief Operating Officer of Evolution Robotics Retail, Inc. In that role, Mr. Sakaguchi co-led a spin off of Evolution Robotics Retail, Inc. from its former parent company and developed and executed a commercialization strategy for a breakthrough visual scanning product targeted for the retail industry. From 1995 until 2003, Mr. Sakaguchi served as the Managing Partner for the North American Energy Strategy Practice at Accenture LLP in Los Angeles. From 1989 until 1995, Mr. Sakaguchi served as the Senior Engagement Manager at McKinsey & Company, Inc. in Los Angeles. Mr. Sakaguchi earned his bachelor’s of science in chemical engineering from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology and his masters in business administration from the Wharton School of the University ofPennsylvania. Mr. Sakaguchi was chosen to serve on our Board because of his extensive business leadership experience with technology and emerging companies and his knowledge of the emerging fuel cell industry.
Dr. Chris D’Couto | Board Member
Dr. Gerard C. D’Couto has served as a member of our Board since January 28, 2008 and as our Chief Executive Officer and President since February 2008. Dr. D’Couto previously served as our Chief Operating Officer and Executive Vice President from September 2007 until February 2008. Prior to joining us, Dr. D’Couto served as senior director of marketing at Form Factor Inc. from January 2006 until September 2007, where he headed the launch of NAND flash and DRAM sort probe cards. Prior to that, Dr. D’Couto had a nine-year tenure at Novellus Systems, Inc., with positions of increasing responsibility ranging from product management to technology development and sales. Prior to that, Dr. D’Couto worked at Varian Associates and as a consultant to Intel Corporation. Dr. D’Couto received a bachelor’s degree in chemical engineering from the Coimbatore Institute of Technology in India and also received a master’s and a doctoral degree in chemical engineering from Clarkson University in New York. Dr. D’Couto also earned an MBA from the Haas School of Business at the University of California, Berkeley. Mr. D’Couto was chosen to serve on our Board because of his management and operational skills from his business school education and past management positions as well as his technical knowledge related to our fuel cell technology.
 
Jon M. Garfield | Board Member
Jon M. Garfield has served on our Board since May 2008. Mr. Garfield is currently the CFO of Monte Nido LLC a behavioral healthcare treatment facility. He served as Chief Executive officer of technology company Clearant, Inc. (OTCBB: CLRA) from January 2007 until October 2010, and as Chief Financial Officer at Clearant, Inc. from September 2006 until January 2007. Mr. Garfield has served as a member of Clearant, Inc.’s board of directors from May 2007 until August 2010. From September 2001 through 2006, Mr. Garfield served as an independent financial consultant, including advising as to SEC reporting obligations and Sarbanes-Oxley compliance. From 1998 until 2001, he served as Chief Financial Officer of a telecom service provider and a software developer. From 1996 to 1998, he served as Vice President of Acquisitions for the formerly NYSE-listed ground transportation consolidator Coach USA, Inc. From 1991 to 1996, Mr. Garfield served as Corporate Assistant Controller of Maxxim Medical, Inc., a formerly New York Stock Exchange listed manufacturer and distributor. During 1986 to 1991, Mr. Garfield practiced public accounting with Arthur Andersen and PricewaterhouseCoopers. Mr. Garfield received a Bachelor of Business Administration in Accounting from University of Texas, Austin. Mr. Garfield was chosen to serve on our Board because of his past experience in chief executive officer and chief financial officer roles at public companies and because of his financial literacy.
William M. Shenkin | Board Member
William M. Shenkin has served on our Board since November 2013.  Mr. Shenkin is currently the CEO and President of CeFO, Inc. Mr. Shenkin specializes in working with businesses and individuals in providing family office services for high net worth individuals, chief financial officer services including strategic business review and planning, monthly financial and accounting review, equity and debt financing, buy/sell negotiations, and tax services. Mr. Shenkin’s professional history encompasses 30 years of CPA, tax, audit and advisory services beginning with Ernst & Young, then Shenkin Kurtz Baker & Co. and presently CeFO, Inc. He is a member of the American Institute of Public Accountants and serves as a Board Member and Board Advisor for numerous companies and non-profits. Mr. Shenkin holds a M.A. in Accounting from Florida Atlantic University.
Scientific Advisory Board
Drs. Wilbert van den Hoek
Drs. van den Hoek retired from Novellus Systems, Inc. in February 2008. He is currently a part-time advisor to Novellus Systems, Inc. From July 1999 through October 2005, he served as chief technical officer and executive vice president, Integration and Advanced Development. From March 2003 – Jan 2005, he was also in charge of the Human Resources organization, and acting General Counsel till Dec 2006. From the end of 2005 through February 2008, he was president and CEO of Novellus Development Company, LLC.Drs. van den Hoek represents Novellus Systems, Inc. as a member of the board of directors of the Semiconductor Research Corp. and as a member of the Governing Council of the Microelectronics Advanced Research Corp. (MARCO). He is a member of the Technical advisory boards of various public and private companies. Drs. Van den Hoek has written over thirty technical publications and holds more than fifteen patents. Drs. van den Hoek received a Doctorandus degree in Chemistry from the Rijks Universiteit Utrecht, The Netherlands. 
Joseph R. Bronson
Mr. Bronson is President and Chief Operating Officer of Sanmina-SCI Corporation (NASDAQ: SANM), a leading electronics contract manufacturer serving the fastest-growing segments of the global electronics manufacturing services (EMS) market. Prior to Sanmina, Mr. Bronson served as President and Director of FormFactor, Inc. (NASDAQ: FORM), a manufacturer of high performance advanced semiconductor wafer probe cards. Mr. Bronson also spent 20 years at Applied Materials (NASDAQ: AMAT) in senior level operations management positions concluding with Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the company.
Dr. Reza Abhari
Dr. Abhari is a professor of Energy Technologies at the Swiss Federal Institute of Technology Zurich (ETH) where he is committed to research and development of advanced energy conversion systems and technologies. Dr. Abhari has served as a consultant to notable companies such as Alstom Power, a global leader in power generation, Daimler (NYSE: DAI), General Electric (NYSE: GE), Honeywell (NYSE: HON), and Toshiba Corp. (TSE: 6502.T). Additionally, he has served as an advisor to several private equity and venture capital firms, providing business, strategic and technical advice in the support of Clean Tech investments.
Dr. Abhari serves as a Member of the Board of Factor3C, a global leader in carbon asset development, and trading of Carbon Emission Reduction credits; Vice-Chairman of the International Gas Turbine Institute; and, Member of NASA Glenn Research Center’s Working Group focusing on aeronautical research. Professor Abhari is a member of the prestigious Swiss Academy of Engineering Sciences, a Fellow of American Society of Mechanical Engineers and the recipient of several scientific awards, as well as a keynote speaker in the US, Europe, and Asia on topics related to climate change and energy supply and conversion. Professor Abhari received his PhD from MIT (1991) in Aeronautics and Astronautics and his MA and BA from Oxford University in Engineering Sciences.
Colonel James Mutter
Colonel James Mutter joins the Company’s Strategic Advisory Board after a distinguished 36-year military career with the US Marine Corps, including five years in USMC research, development, test and evaluation positions, about 15 years in senior command and control positions in both field and garrison, and also several tours as Chief of Staff at various commands. Following his military career, Col. Mutter was Sr. VP for Administration at Sensys Corp in D.C., has consulted with a number of military support contractors, and was President of the National Military Family Association. In 1998, he received the civilian US Navy Distinguished Public Service Award. After graduating from University of New Mexico in 1961, and serving two tours of duty in Vietnam, Col. Mutter was selected to attend graduate school and earned a Masters Degree in Financial Management at George Washington University.
Lieutenant General Carol Mutter (Ret.)
Lieutenant General Carol Mutter (retired) joins Neah Power’s Strategic Advisory Board after a celebrated 31-year career with the US Marine Corps where she retired as a Lieutenant General in 1999. General Mutter possesses 13 years of experience in military research, development and acquisition in addition to her experience in financial management, logistics, personnel administration, and equal opportunity. She was appointed by the President of the U.S. to the American Battle Monuments Commission, and currently serves on the National Advisory Council of The Alliance for National Defense, on the Advisory Board of the Indiana Council on World Affairs, on the Indiana State (legislative) Commission on Military and Veterans Affairs, and participates as a Senior Fellow at the Joint Forces Staff College in Norfolk, VA. More recently, Gen. Mutter has been a consultant for companies including IBM (NYSE: IBM), Raytheon Co. (NYSE: RTN), Revision Eyewear, as well as virtual training and nanotechnology organizations, directly contributing to their relationships with and success in obtaining government contracts. Gen. Mutter earned two masters degrees; one from Salve Regina University and the other from Naval War College, and has been awarded two honorary doctorate degrees.
John P. de Neufville
John P. de Neufville purchased the ChemOvonics Division from ECD in 1986 and founded Voltaix, Inc. a high purity specialty gas business which was sold to Air Liquide America in 2013.  Subsequently, he purchased the assets formerly associated with the GM-ECD JV that produced the then novel nickel-metal hydride batteries for GM’s first all-electric car, the EV-1, creating a new company, Eutectix, LLC, based in Troy, MI and currently serving as Eutectix’ CEO and Chief Scientist.  His early research interests focused on materials for batteries, optical memory devices, and solar cells, prepared by sputtering, chemical vapor deposition and plasma deposition.  At Exxon, John was a member of the team that developed a concept of selective remote sensing of uranyl minerals using laser induced fluorescence.  At Voltaix he played a key role in scaling the synthesis of various molecules used for the chemical vapor deposition of insulating, semiconducting and conducting films for advanced integrated circuit and photovoltaic applications.  John P.de Neufville holds a PhD. in applied physics and materials science from Harvard University and an M.S. in geology from Harvard University and a B.S. in geology from Yale University.



























Media | Neah Power Systems | leading innovator of unique energy solutions



































Neah Power Corporate Media and Recent News
Request for Interviews: Media please contact Neah Power at (425) 424.3324 x108 or use this form to send us an email.
 





NEAH POWER SYSTEMS WINS U. S. Department of Energy grant for lithium metal battery

Posted on August 23, 2016  by  Neah Power 


BATTERY characterization by Argonne National laboratory
Bothell, WA (August 23, 2016) – Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ, NEAH POWER) an emerging leader in high density rechargeable lithium metal battery storage solutions for defense, commercial, and consumer applications, is pleased to announce that it won a grant from the U.S. Department of Energy through the Small Business Vouchers Pilot Program. http://energy.gov/technologytransitions/articles/energy-department-awards-43-new-business-laboratory-collaborations
The NEAH PowerChip® Battery is the first battery to be made with high volume capable microchip manufacturing technology in semiconductor facilities (foundries) throughout the world. NEAH and numerous electrochemical engineers worldwide envision this new NEAH Battery architecture as transformative as it will change the way batteries are made, used and perform. The proprietary architecture of the PowerChip® Battery brings batteries into the microchip era, using the same manufacturing technologies that made television sets, cell phones, laptops and a variety of devices more compact with superior performance at lower cost. While initially targeted for consumer oriented applications, the battery technology could be used for automotive and defense applications as well.
Dr. Chris D’Couto, President & CEO of NEAH said, “We look forward to working closely with Argonne National Laboratory, which is uniquely qualified to characterize the performance metrics associated with our unique battery architecture. This unique 3D architecture using lithium metal anodes enables more than five times the performance of batteries in production today.  We at NEAH believe that the characterization of the battery by Argonne National Laboratory will further enhance the performance and manufacturability of the battery. It will also help us understand the most critical electrochemical reactions. This DOE/Argonne relationship will provide advanced technology learnings, leapfrogging what would be possible in a privately held laboratory.
About the Small Business Vouchers Pilot
The U.S. Department of Energy Small Business Vouchers Pilot is a collaborative, national effort that provides $20M for U.S. companies to work with National Laboratories. Vouchers focus on nine clean energy technologies.
The SBV Pilot is an initiative of the U.S. Department of Energy, DOE’s Office of Energy Efficiency & Renewable Energy, and participating DOE national labs.
About Neah Power Systems, Inc.
Neah Power’s core fuel cell solutions have a small form factor, recharge instantly, and operable in air and non-air environments, providing a longer life with lower total cost of ownership. The PowerChip® battery leverages the proven silicon architecture to build a rechargeable lithium battery that is demonstrating industry leading performance. Neah Power’s Solutions offerings include the patented and patent pending PowerChip®, Formira® and the BuzzBar Suite® of products. For more information please visit www.neahpower.com.
For more information, or customer enquiries, please contact 
Contact:Jeffrey May CPAjmay@neahpower.com425 424 3324 ext 105
Forward Looking Statements
Certain of the statements contained herein may be, within the meaning of the federal securities laws, “forward-looking statements,” which are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, and Neah Power does not undertake any responsibility to update any of these statements in the future. Please read Neah Power’s Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2015 and its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for a discussion of such risks, uncertainties and other factors.





NEAH POWER SYSTEMS Battery Proposal Selected As Semi-Finalist

Posted on July 8, 2016  by  Neah Power 


Bothell, WA (July 8, 2016) – Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ, NEAH POWER) an emerging leader in fuel cell-based power solutions and rechargeable lithium battery storage solutions for defense, commercial, and consumer applications, is pleased to announce that it was selected as a semi-finalist by the Department of Energy (DOE). The Company and the National Laboratory partner are required to make certain additional submissions by July 8 2016 to the DOE as part of the semi-finalist review.   
In the battery submission, the focus is on characterizing the battery and performing a deconstruction analysis to determine methods to increase the energy density and / or increase the lifetime of the battery.
About Neah Power Systems, Inc.
Neah Power’s core fuel cell solutions have a small form factor, recharge instantly, and operable in air and non-air environments, providing a longer life with lower total cost of ownership. The PowerChip® battery leverages the proven silicon architecture to build a rechargeable lithium battery that is demonstrating industry leading performance. Neah Power’s Solutions offerings include the patented and patent pending PowerChip®, Formira® and the BuzzBar Suite® of products. For more information please visit www.neahpower.com.
For more information, or customer enquiries, please contact 
Neah Power Systems Inc. Contact:
Jeffrey May CPAjmay@neahpower.com425 424 3324 ext 105 
Forward Looking Statements
Certain of the statements contained herein may be, within the meaning of the federal securities laws, “forward-looking statements,” which are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, and Neah Power does not undertake any responsibility to update any of these statements in the future. Please read Neah Power’s Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2015 and its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for a discussion of such risks, uncertainties and other factors.





NEAH POWER SYSTEMS SUBMITS PROPOSAL FOR DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY FUNDING

Posted on June 7, 2016  by  Neah Power 


Funding submissions for Battery and Hydrogen Fuel Cell 
Bothell, WA (June7, 2016) – Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ, NEAH POWER) an emerging leader in fuel cell-based power solutions and rechargeable lithium battery storage solutions for defense, commercial, and consumer applications, proudly announced that the Company had submitted two separate proposals for Department of Energy (DOE) funding. One submission was related to the rechargeable lithium battery, and the second submission was related to a hydrogen fuel cell. Both the technologies use the Company’s proprietary silicon architecture. In both cases, a reputed National Laboratory was identified as the preferred partner. A response to these submissions is expected by end of June 2016.
In the battery submission, the focus is on characterizing the battery and performing a deconstruction analysis to determine methods to increase the energy density and / or increase the lifetime of the battery. In the fuel cell submission, the emphasis is on benchmarking and characterizing the fuel cell, and evaluating means to reduce the cost of operation of the fuel cell.
About Neah Power Systems, Inc.Neah Power’s core fuel cell solutions have a small form factor, recharge instantly, and operable in air and non-air environments, providing a longer life with lower total cost of ownership. The PowerChip® battery leverages the proven silicon architecture to build a rechargeable lithium battery that is demonstrating industry leading performance. Neah Power’s Solutions offerings include the patented and patent pending PowerChip®, Formira® and the BuzzBar Suite® of products. For more information please visit www.neahpower.com.
 
For more information, or customer enquiries, please contact Neah Power Systems Inc. Contact:Jeffrey May CPAjmay@neahpower.com425 424 3324 ext 105
Forward Looking StatementsCertain of the statements contained herein may be, within the meaning of the federal securities laws, “forward-looking statements,” which are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, and Neah Power does not undertake any responsibility to update any of these statements in the future. Please read Neah Power’s Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2015 and its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for a discussion of such risks, uncertainties and other factors.





NEAH Power systems ISSUES Letter to Shareholders – March 2016

Posted on March 16, 2016  by  Neah Power 


Ongoing commercialization and exciting developments at the Company
BOTHELL, WA – March 16, 2016 – Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ) (OTC: NPWZ) – today issued the following letter to shareholders: 
Dear Fellow Shareholders:
We are enthused about the ongoing capitalization and commercialization activities at the Company and the opportunity to share these developments with you. For recent followers of the Company, we want to highlight our key products. We have the PowerChip® anaerobic (non-air) fuel cell, most recently accepted by the Defense Research and Development Organization (DRDO) of the Government of India. We also have the Formira Hydrogen on Demand (Formira HOD), the most energy dense solution for the generation of hydrogen from a safe liquid source. The BuzzBar Suite is an off-grid charging solution for consumer and commercial applications. We shipped our BuzzBar Gen2 product, and have a Gen3 design that will ship once we close the next round of financing. Finally, we have the PowerChip® Battery under development that has shown industry leading performance. All of our products and technologies are covered by 14 patents, 12 pending patent applications and various trade secrets and know how.
Capitalization: Our previously announced financing of $6M in debt financing, with a $4.75M drawdown at closing has been delayed but the investor updates us constantly. They have reported receiving funds from their investor now for the last eight weeks, and once various banking and fund set up fees have been paid, they have stated they will start funding NEAH. This investor has a very credible multi-year track record of investing in market disrupting emerging technology companies. The details of this investment were previously disclosed in the December 2015 letter to shareholders. The financing is critical to execute on the business plan of the Company. The Company is also evaluating other financing options.
Business update:

NEAH was invited to participate in the White House briefing on Feb 17. We have had various commercialization and capitalization discussions occur based on the networking at that event. As a direct result of attending the White House conference on Climate Change, we have been invited to attend three USTDA Reverse Trade Missions Focused on Energy Storage. The delegates are senior officials from South Africa, Jordon, Brazil, Colombia, India, the Philippines, Turkey and Vietnam.
I recently visited the United Arab Emirates (UAE) to explore certain licensing relationships to implement manufacturing and other partnership agreements. There is tremendous interest with the entities I met with to develop UAE into a renewable energy focused hub. We continue to explore and to finalize a mutually beneficial business relationship here.  
We are in discussions with the Economic Development Authority of State in the USA regarding relocating to that State to enable their focus on renewable energy and battery storage. We expect this to get finalized in Q2 2016.
We continue to make progress on the previously announced MOU with a South Africa entity. We are in almost daily discussions with them, and are targeting an agreement with them by end of Q2 2016. This will provide a key production pathway for meeting our customer needs.
We have been negotiating a licensing agreement with an entity in India for the BuzzBar Suite and the Formira HOD products. India has been identified as one of the fastest growing markets for off-grid power, and this relationship can enable NEAH products to serve this region.
We have been negotiating a Formira HOD licensing with a group in Taiwan for the Greater China Region. Similar to India, the demand for off-grid power is significant, and continuing to grow in this region. This licensee partner is expected to visit us in the near future which will enable us to complete the anticipated transaction.
Our discussions with the DRDO are ongoing, and we expect to schedule a visit in Q2 2016.
We plan to submit for two separate grants for certain DOE funding with a National Laboratory in the US during the next 30 days.
Finally, the PowerChip® Battery continues to get tremendous interest from consumers and commercial entities. We are negotiating preliminary orders for this product, and due to the outsourced manufacturing model, we believe we can manufacture this very capital efficiently

While our capitalization situation is very challenging, the management is diligently working to complete various capitalization and commercialization activities that will help unlock the potential of the Company. We are pursuing licensing agreements initially since that would enable licensee partners to create manufacturing infrastructure to meet their needs but also the needs of NEAH.
Thank you for your continued support, and best regards,
Chris D’CoutoPresident & CEO
 
For further information, please contact:David Schmidt, CFOinfo@neahpower.com425-424-3324 ext. 105
Forward Looking StatementsCertain of the statements contained herein may be, within the meaning of the federal securities laws, “forward-looking statements,” which are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, and the Company does not undertake any responsibility to update any of these statements in the future. Please read Neah Power System’s Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2015 and its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC during fiscal 2015 for a discussion of such risks, uncertainties and other factors.





NEAH POWER SYSTEMS INVITED TO WHITE HOUSE BRIEFING

Posted on February 16, 2016  by  Neah Power 


Climate change & sustainable energy production to be discussed
Bothell, WA (Feb 16, 2016) – Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ, NEAH) an emerging leader in fuel cell-based power solutions and rechargeable lithium battery storage solutions for defense, commercial, and consumer applications, proudly announced that Dr. Chris D’Couto, President & CEO, was invited to attending a White House Business Council briefing on February 17 2016 on renewable energy and climate change.
The White House Business Council and Business Forward are organizing the briefing at the White House with senior Administration officials on Wednesday, February 17 to discuss efforts to make America the world leader in sustainable energy production and methods for mitigating the effects of severe weather. Dr. D’Couto and others will brief senior Administration officials on how the government can help spur investments that will bring new energy products and solutions to market.
Dr. Chris D’Couto, President & CEO of NEAH, said, “I am honored to be invited to this prestigious event and to participate in solving one of the most pressing issues of our time. This is a generational issue and a legacy that we will leave our children and grandchildren. The leadership by the White House Business Council and Business Forward is commendable and I look forward to making our country a leader in the clean tech arena, while creating high quality jobs and offering world-class solutions.
Dr. D’Couto further added, “We believe that the NEAH PowerChip®  fuel cell, the Formira Hydrogen-on-demand products, and the PowerChip® battery product under development, besides offering very differentiated and cost effective solutions for off-grid power and hydrogen-on-demand, will help mitigate global warming and make our country a leader in the clean energy landscape.”
About Neah Power Systems, Inc.
Neah Power’s core fuel cell solutions have a small form factor, recharge instantly, and operable in air and non-air environments, providing a longer life with lower total cost of ownership. The PowerChip® battery leverages the proven silicon architecture to build a rechargeable lithium battery that is demonstrating industry leading performance. Neah Power’s Solutions offerings include the patented and patent pending PowerChip®, Formira® and the BuzzBar Suite® of products. For more information please visit www.neahpower.com.
About Business Forward
With the help of more than 50 of the world’s most respected companies, Business Forward is making it easier for tens of thousands of business leaders from across America to advise Washington on how to create jobs and accelerate our economy. Business Forward is active in more than 100 cities and works with more than 450 senior Administration officials, Members of Congress, governors, and mayors.
To date, the organization has also brought more than 3,000 business leaders to the White House to brief the President’s economic advisors. Business leaders who have participated in these briefings have seen their suggestions implemented in the Affordable Care Act, the Jobs Act, three trade agreements, and every one of the President’s budgets. Many have also shared their recommendations with their representatives in Congress and through op-eds and interviews with local media. Ninety-eight out of 100 business leaders who have participated in a Business Forward briefing would be interested in participating in another one. For more information please visit www.BusinessFWD.org.





NEAH POWER SYSTEMS SIGNS MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH SOUTH AFRICAN ENTITY

Posted on December 23, 2015  by  Neah Power 


Licensing deal for serving the fast growing Africa market 
Bothell, WA (Date, 2015) – Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ, NEAH POWER) an emerging leader in fuel cell-based power solutions and rechargeable lithium battery storage solutions for defense, commercial, and consumer applications, proudly announced that the Company has signed a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with a large South Africa based entity, to license the NEAH’s technology. This license would include the PowerChip® fuel cell technology, the Formira HOD® technology and theBuzzBar technology. 
Chris D’Couto, President and CEO of NEAH POWER said, “We are pleased to announce this MOU with a well-established, significant South Africa entity (SAE). As we continue to innovate and develop products, this relationship will enable cost effective manufacturing in one of the fastest growing markets for these products, as well as the ability to get high volume supply from this factory to meet our worldwide needs”.   
The Company and the entity are working diligently to finalize certain financial details including upfront license payments, equipment purchase and installation support payments, and royalty payments on a go-forward basis. The Company and the SAE expect to create a joint venture where the Company would have partial ownership. The Company is expected to release more details about this important strategic venture, and expects to formalize the various agreements, in first quarter of 2016. 
About Neah Power Systems, Inc Neah Power’s core fuel cell solutions have a small form factor, recharge instantly, and operable in air and non-air environments, providing a longer life with lower total cost of ownership.  Neah Power’s Solutions offerings include the patented and patent pending PowerChip®, Formira® and the BuzzBar Suite® of products. For more information please visit www.neahpower.com. 
For more information, or customer enquiries, please contact   
Neah Power Systems Inc. Contact: 
David Schmidt dschmidt@neahpower.com 425 424 3324 ext 105 
 
Forward Looking Statements Certain of the statements contained herein may be, within the meaning of the federal securities laws, “forward-looking statements,” which are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, and Neah Power does not undertake any responsibility to update any of these statements in the future. Please read Neah Power’s Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2014 and its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for a discussion of such risks, uncertainties and other factors. 





NEAH POWER SYSTEMS ISSUES LETTER TO  SHAREHOLDERS – PART II

Posted on December 1, 2015  by  Neah Power 


Highlights ongoing business initiatives in Part II on Dec 2 2015
BOTHELL, WA – Dec 1, 2015 – Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ) (OTC: NPWZ) – today issued the following letter to shareholders:
Dear Fellow Shareholders:Continuing from Part I from yesterday, please see Part II, the update on the various business initiatives
Status of the Shorai Acquisition
Due to the lack of transaction financing, we have decided to postpone the Shorai Acquisition until a larger financing can be closed.
Status of Certain Business Development Initiatives: 
Below is a summary of some of the Company’s business development initiatives which, together with other public disclosures made by the Company (including those contained in our most recently published letter to shareholders), should be taken into consideration when considering a loan or investment. 
Formira HOD® 
NEAH recently released an improved version of the Formira HOD, with BASF, the German Chemical Company, as a preferred supplier for the Formira fuel.
To date, NEAH Power has entered into various teaming agreements with system integrators and manufacturers to incorporate our products into their platforms, as well as resell our products to their customers. In addition, we are presently negotiating an order for several demonstration units with Clear Path Technologies, a leading security and defense system integrator which is developing markets for our fuel cell products in the U.S., Asia Pacific, and MENA regions.
A recently released video including a technical overview and demonstration of our Formira HOD® system can be found at the following link:
( https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NQiQ-I77DPc)
DRDO Licensing 
NEAH has recently been in high level communications with the DRDO. This has been driven by the recent appointment of the DRDO chief, whose position remained vacant for almost 5 months, since the termination of the previous DRDO chief in Jan 2015. This has created tremendous positive momentum to finalize the licensing proposal that was previously submitted to the DRDO. We are in commercial close at this time, pending a specific date for negotiation and finalization of the licensing agreement.
PowerChip® Battery Update
So far the performance of the battery has exceeded expectations, such that we have begun to discuss developmental and licensing opportunities with leading battery manufacturers, system integrators, and other companies involved in, or seeking entry into, the very lucrative energy storage sector. We are currently in preliminary discussions with consumer and computing companies, battery manufacturers, and parties who have expressed interest in investing directly into the battery opportunity. Any such direct investment into the battery opportunity could potentially lead to a spin out of this technology.
Customer Sales / Licensing Discussions
The Company is also actively engaged in the following sales and licensing initiatives which are expected to deliver results and sales revenues in the near term:

We have a non-binding MOU for a strategic Joint Venture with a South African Consortium comprised of a Provincial Government and Platinum Mining Conglomerates regarding the sale and transfer of a license to produce NEAH Power’s fuel cell products for sale in Africa and the Middle East. Said JV is expected to generate significant revenues, as well as provide a preferred source of raw materials for the production of NEAH Power fuel cells and reformers. This JV is expected to generate short term revenue and ongoing royalty payments creating significant long term value for the Company. We are finalizing dates to visit, and to potentially execute final documents during the visit, for this initiative.


Our Teaming Agreements with Clear Path Technologies, Tectonica (Pvt) Ltd, S4W Technologies, Silent Falcon and Black-I Robotics, to integrate NEAH Power’s power generation and energy storage technologies in mature product lines with established customer bases, while rapidly and cost-effectively developing global markets for its products. Some of the licensing agreements under negotiation, discussed in Part I, developed from these Teaming agreements. Anticipated sales revenues under these teaming agreements is expected to reach $20mm in three years.


We are discussing a strategic Joint Venture with a Street Furniture/Outdoor Advertising company regarding the sale and integration of NEAH Power’s remote power solutions for long-term operation of public advertising displays to be installed under existing municipal contracts. Anticipated sales revenues under this JV is expected to reach $6mm in two years.

Thank you for your continued support, and best regards,
Chris D’CoutoPresident & CEO
 
For further information, please contact:info@neahpower.com425-424-3324 ext. 10
Forward Looking StatementsCertain of the statements contained herein may be, within the meaning of the federal securities laws, “forward-looking statements,” which are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, and the Company does not undertake any responsibility to update any of these statements in the future. Please read Neah Power System’s Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2014 and its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC during fiscal 2015 for a discussion of such risks, uncertainties and other factors.
 





NEAH POWER SYSTEMS ISSUES LETTER TO SHAREHOLDERS – PART I

Posted on November 30, 2015  by  Neah Power 


Highlights continued progress and discusses commercialization, ongoing business initiatives in Part II on Dec 2 2015
BOTHELL, WA – Dec 1, 2015 – Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ) (OTC: NPWZ) – today issued the following letter to shareholders:
Dear Fellow Shareholders:
Over the last six months, NEAH Power Systems has witnessed a tremendous response to our products and technologies. Recently, we have announced teaming agreements with several leading companies in the security/defense, robotics and mobile electronics industries. Additionally, we have expanded industry relationships with battery and fuel cell suppliers and manufacturers and have entered into discussions with multiple strategic partners regarding the license, sale and manufacture of NEAH Power’s products. To help facilitate and manage this growth the Company, has also expanded with the addition of several key consultants and advisors bringing high value associations including potential co-development sponsors within the U.S. Government. All of this, together with other significant advancements, is expected to open the door to the use of our products in several rapidly expanding markets, including transportation/automotive, distributed energy/smart grid infrastructure and telecommunications, and result in significant revenue growth.
Dr. Chris D’Couto was also interviewed by Money TV®, which can be seen here https://vimeo.com/145571430
As to current capital-raising efforts, the company had previously entered into a senior secured loan agreement with a Connecticut based investment fund. The loan agreement provides for $6 million in debt financing with an initial draw down of $4.5 million at closing. For each drawdown, interest is accrued at LIBOR plus 4% with maximum interest rate of 6%. There is no repayment within the first three years. Additional details will be provided at the time of funding. While we have had significant delays, the Investor believes that this funding is expected to close sometime in 4Q 2015 based on latest guidance. Due diligence by the investor has gone well, and both parties have agreed to final documents, which will be executed at funding. We are receiving status updates on an almost daily basis.
A Note to Potential Investors: the Securities and Exchange Commission recently amended Regulation D by, among other things, creating Rule 506 (c) that now permits the Company to announce investment opportunities, publicly. Subject to certain due diligence requirements to confirm that any investor is “accredited”, potential investors should contact: Mr. David Schmidt (info@neahpower.com)_- at the Company to explore current investment opportunities
Other business development activity includes –

$3mm to $5mm equity funding or license payment with a sovereign fund of a Middle East nation, subject to satisfactory due diligence, and finalization of the material terms.
Consultant-generated licensing and funding opportunities, ranging from $1mm to $3mm with certain qualified parties from the UAE, Qatar, Saudi Arabia, Singapore, Indonesia, Malaysia, Vietnam and China, also subject to due diligence and negotiation of definitive agreements.

We believe these capitalization and commercialization efforts would help accelerate product deployment and unlock the intrinsic value of the Company.
We will further discuss ongoing commercial initiatives tomorrow, Dec 2nd 2015.
Thank you for your continued support, and best regards,
Chris D’CoutoPresident & CEO
For further information, please contact:info@neahpower.com425-424-3324 ext. 105
Forward Looking Statements
Certain of the statements contained herein may be, within the meaning of the federal securities laws, “forward-looking statements,” which are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, and the Company does not undertake any responsibility to update any of these statements in the future. Please read Neah Power System’s Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2014 and its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC during fiscal 2015 for a discussion of such risks, uncertainties and other factors.





Neah Power Systems Releases Improved Formira Hydrogen-on-Demand Product

Posted on October 20, 2015  by  Jonathan K 


Product targeted for stand-alone off-the-grid applications, BASF is preferred supplier
Bothell, WA (Oct. 20, 2015) – Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ, NEAH POWER) an emerging leader in fuel cell-based power solutions and rechargeable lithium battery storage solutions for defense, commercial, and consumer applications, proudly announced the launch of the improved Formira HOD® platform, releasing a video that can be viewed online (YouTube Link: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NQiQ-I77DPc) and the white paper and spec sheet for the product that allows potential customers to estimate the size of the fuel cell for their specific application (PDF Download: http://dtn.fm/Formic-Acid-Hydrogen-Reformer-for-Fuel-Cells). The Company also noted that it has chosen BASF to be its preferred supplier of formic acid for the Formira HOD platform through its global network of production and distribution sites.
President and CEO of NEAH POWER said, “We are so proud to be launching this improved product. We believe this is the most energy dense, safe, cost effective, liquid source for the generation of hydrogen. The hydrogen can be used for a variety of applications, as a fuel for fuel cells, for metals processing, and other applications. We have also taken the unusual step of posting our product spec sheet on the website, with a simple calculator that customers can use to determine the size of a system for their specific application”.  He further noted, “Unlike other reformer technologies, we use the same fuel source (formic acid) to run the reformer and to generate hydrogen, and the fuel contains less than 5% water, unlike other reformers that can contain 30% or more water. The hydrogen generated is consumed by the fuel cell, and we do not store the gaseous hydrogen, addressing various safety and handling concerns related to compressed hydrogen use in fuel cells.”
This Formira HOD® product has generated significant interest from customers and partners due to the lack of alternate high energy density, instantly rechargeable solutions. These teaming agreements with Tectonica (Pvt) Ltd, Clear Path Technologies®, Silent Falcon, S4 Worldwide and Black-I Robotics allow them to incorporate the Formira HOD into their product platforms, and to partner with NEAH POWER to offer the product in other geographical markets as well. The Company will continue to update on the exciting commercialization of this disruptive product.
About Neah Power Systems, Inc
Neah Power’s core fuel cell solutions have a small form factor, recharge instantly, and operable in air and non-air environments, providing a longer life with lower total cost of ownership.  Neah Power’s Solutions offerings include the patented and patent pending PowerChip®, Formira® and the BuzzBar Suite® of products. For more information please visit www.neahpower.com.
About BASF
BASF Corporation, headquartered in Florham Park, New Jersey, is the North American affiliate of BASF SE, Ludwigshafen, Germany. BASF has more than 17,000 employees in North America, and had sales of $20.6 billion in 2014. For more information about BASF’s North American operations, visit www.basf.us.
At BASF, we create chemistry – and have been doing so for 150 years. Our portfolio ranges from chemicals, plastics, performance products and crop protection products to oil and gas. As the world’s leading chemical company, we combine economic success with environmental protection and social responsibility. Through science and innovation, we enable our customers in nearly every industry to meet the current and future needs of society. Our products and solutions contribute to conserving resources, ensuring nutrition and improving quality of life. We have summed up this contribution in our corporate purpose: We create chemistry for a sustainable future. BASF had sales of over €74 billion in 2014 and around 113,000 employees as of the end of the year. Further information on BASF is available on the Internet at www.basf.com.
For more information, or customer enquiries, please contact 
Neah Power Systems Inc. Contact:
David Schmidt
dschmidt@neahpower.com
Tel.: (425) 424-3324 ext. 105
BASF Contact: 
Albania Lara
Tel.: (973) 245-5764
albania.lara@basf.com
Forward Looking Statements
Certain of the statements contained herein may be, within the meaning of the federal securities laws, “forward-looking statements,” which are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, and Neah Power does not undertake any responsibility to update any of these statements in the future. Please read Neah Power’s Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2014 and its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for a discussion of such risks, uncertainties and other factors.





NEAH Power Systems and S4 Worldwide Execute Teaming Agreement for Business and Product Development

Posted on September 16, 2015  by  Neah Power 


S4 Worldwide to receive initial production of NEAH Power’s porous silicon battery for integration in Body Worn Cameras for Police and Security Professionals
Bothell, WA (Sept 16, 2015) – NEAH Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ) (“NEAH POWER”) and S4W Worldwide Technologies (“S4W”) have announced a teaming agreement, by which both parties will work together to integrate NEAH POWER’s patented power generation and energy storage technologies with S4W’s industry leading security and defense products.
Under the agreement, NEAH POWER will deliver commercial units of its patented formic acid reformer fuel cell (Formira HOD™) and engineering units of its PowerChip® fuel cell and PowerChip® Battery. In addition, NEAH POWER will provide S4W with engineering and technical support to ensure successful integration into S4W’s products.
The agreement, which allows NEAH POWER and S4W to cooperatively market each of the other’s products, is expected to expand the number of distribution and sales channels available to the partners, and allow each to fully exploit the capabilities and growing customer bases of the other, with high capital efficiency.
Of particular focus in the agreement, is the cooperation of the parties on the anticipated commercialization and release of NEAH POWER’s ground breaking porous silicon-chip based PowerChip® Battery. In connection with the agreement, NEAH POWER will deliver S4W, as a preferred partner, initial production runs of the PowerChip® Battery for incorporation in S4W’s state-of-the-art body worn cameras currently being marketed to police and security professionals worldwide.
“We are most enthused to partner with S4W and their engineering teams to develop industry leading products with unprecedented durations of operation”, announced Chris D’Couto, President and CEO of Neah Power Systems, Inc. “The partnership with S4W, with its high caliber management and sales organization, will allow us to further advance our system integration strategy, while increasing the number of markets for the products offered by NEAH POWER and its partners. I strongly believe that this cooperation between NEAH POWER and S4W fits perfectly with our mantra to deliver power generation and energy storage solutions that are ‘smaller, lighter and more powerful’.”
Paul Sault, CEO of S4W complemented, “S4W welcomes the opportunity to co-develop and market product incorporating NEAH POWER’s advanced technologies. Our engineering staff and consultants immediately recognized the transformative nature of NEAH POWER’s Formira HOD™ and PowerChip® solutions, specifically, when incorporated in a highly disruptive product like our Smart Body Cam where continuous power is necessary for delivery of the ever-important personnel and public safety benefits they provide. Upon first being introduced to NEAH POWER’s PowerChip® Battery, S4W was eager to become an early adopter. While interviewing countless numbers of public safety personnel about what features they wanted to see standard on a body camera, having the power necessary to make it through an entire shift without battery recharging or replacement, ranked very near the top.”
Chris D’Couto added, “As previously reported, NEAH POWER has incorporated its award-winning and patented PowerChip® fuel cell architecture into the patent pending PowerChip® battery. To date, this new battery design has exhibited unprecedented performance characteristics. As NEAH POWER moves closer to first commercial release of the PowerChip® Battery, NEAH POWER expects to continue to work in close cooperation with companies like S4W in expanding integration opportunities and advancing other pre-launch activities.”
About Neah Power Systems, Inc
Neah Power Systems, Inc. is an innovator and supplier of cutting-edge power solutions for the military, transportation and portable electronics industries. Neah Power’s long-lasting, efficient, and safe solutions include patented and patent pending PowerChip®, Formira® and the BuzzBar Suite® of products. Most recently, Neah Power Systems was a 2012 ZINO Green Finalist, 2010 WTIA Finalist, and 2010 Best of What’s New Popular Science Award. For more information visit www.neahpower.com.
About S4 Worldwide
S4 WORLDWIDE provides mobile real-time situational awareness technologies to business decision-makers. Using environmentally friendly, solar and wind powered trailer-mounted systems, video, audio, and sensor data is gathered from remote sites and electronically presented to users through a secure website and onto their laptops, tablets, or smartphones. S4W’s vision is to be the leader in responsive, real-time dynamic business tools for decision-makers. For more information visit www.s4worldwide.com
Forward Looking Statements
Certain of the statements contained herein may be, within the meaning of the federal securities laws, “forward-looking statements,” which are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, and the Company does not undertake any responsibility to update any of these statements in the future. Please read Neah Power System’s Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2014 and its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC during fiscal 2015 for a discussion of such risks, uncertainties and other factors.
For more information please contact the Company at
Neah Power Systems Inc.David Kugelmandkugelman@neahpower.com         (866) 692-6847 Toll Free – U.S. & Canada.






 
Search



Financial Update New Proxy Form Def 14A
  Recent News 

NEAH POWER SYSTEMS WINS U. S. Department of Energy grant for lithium metal battery
August 23, 2016


NEAH POWER SYSTEMS Battery Proposal Selected As Semi-Finalist
July 8, 2016


NEAH POWER SYSTEMS SUBMITS PROPOSAL FOR DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY FUNDING
June 7, 2016


NEAH Power systems ISSUES Letter to Shareholders – March 2016
March 16, 2016


NEAH POWER SYSTEMS INVITED TO WHITE HOUSE BRIEFING
February 16, 2016


 Neah on Twitter Tweets by @neahpowerinc

 















NPWZ Stock Price - Neah Power Systems Inc. Stock Quote (U.S.: OTC) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,580.07


-31.71


-0.15%











S&P 500

2,472.54


-0.91


-0.04%











Nasdaq

6,387.75


-2.25


-0.04%











GlobalDow

2,833.20


-8.47


-0.30%











Gold

1,261.10


9.00


0.72%











Oil

45.60


-1.32


-2.81%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



CTAS 
9.2




COF 
8.6




ETFC 
5.1




SYF 
4.5






HP
-5.5




ISRG
-4.6




HBAN
-4.4




CHK
-3.1














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








07/21

Charges dropped after ‘London Whale’ accused Jamie Dimon of making him a fall guy



07/21

Goodbye, Sean Spicer: Memorable Moments From the Podium  



07/21

How to Fix Wall Street, and Bankers' Pay



07/21

Amazon, Whole Foods look to head off lengthy deal review



07/21

Hawaii adopts emergency plan for North Korea missile attack



07/21

 California Wildfire Destroys Homes Near Yosemite



07/21

Spicer Quits as Scaramucci Accepts White House Job



07/21

Updated
Why you shouldn’t order ice on a flight, and other ‘dirty little secrets’ 



07/21

Updated
If you’re reading this, you have a 19.3% chance of being rich



07/21

Updated
5 unfortunate reasons why millennials can’t have nice things (or save any money)












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


NPWZ


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors

 



NPWZ
U.S.: OTC


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Neah Power Systems Inc.

Watchlist 
CreateNPWZAlert



  


Closed

Last Updated: Jul 21, 2017 5:20 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
0.0012



-0.0001
-7.69%






Previous Close




$0.0013





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




29.88% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    2.8M
                


                65 Day Avg. - 9.5M
            





Open: 0.0013
Close: 0.0012



0.0011
Day Low/High
0.0013





Day Range



0.0002
52 Week Low/High
0.0031


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$0.0013



Day Range
0.0011 - 0.0013



52 Week Range
0.0002 - 0.0031



Market Cap
$2.93M



Shares Outstanding
2.25B



Public Float
2.25B



Beta
n/a



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
$0.00



Yield
n/a



Dividend
n/a



Ex-Dividend Date
n/a



Short Interest
n/a
n/a


% of Float Shorted
n/a



Average Volume
9.46M




 


Performance




5 Day


140.00%







1 Month


300.00%







3 Month


9.09%







YTD


144.90%







1 Year


500.00%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones




No Headlines Available




No Headlines Available











Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






10-Q: NEAH POWER SYSTEMS, INC.


Aug. 22, 2016 at 4:43 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Neah Power: A Fast-Growing Fuel-Cell Name


Jan. 23, 2014 at 12:41 p.m. ET
on Wall St. Cheat Sheet









Further Clarification From Neah Power Systems, Inc. Regarding Filing of Form 15 to Voluntarily Suspend Its SEC Reporting Obligations
Further Clarification From Neah Power Systems, Inc. Regarding Filing of Form 15 to Voluntarily Suspend Its SEC Reporting Obligations

May. 17, 2017 at 4:32 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Neah Power Systems, Inc. Announces Filing of Form 15 to Voluntarily Suspend Its SEC Reporting Obligations
Neah Power Systems, Inc. Announces Filing of Form 15 to Voluntarily Suspend Its SEC Reporting Obligations

May. 15, 2017 at 4:00 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Neah Power Systems Company Update - March 2017


Mar. 27, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Global Rechargeable Batteries Industry


Jan. 9, 2017 at 11:37 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Neah Power Systems Company Update - November 2016


Nov. 3, 2016 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





ReportLinker Review:  Global Rechargeable Batteries Industry


Sep. 26, 2016 at 7:06 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Global Consumer Batteries Industry


Sep. 22, 2016 at 7:01 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Fuel-Cell Power Based Battery Solutions Growth Propelled Via Federally Approved Grants Targeting Research And Development of Batteries with Microchip Technology


Aug. 23, 2016 at 8:50 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Neah Power Systems Wins U. S. Department of Energy Grant for Lithium Metal Battery


Aug. 23, 2016 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF











Neah Power Systems Inc.


            
            Neah Power Systems, Inc. engages in the development and sale of renewable energy solutions using proprietary fuel cell technology. Its fuel cells are designed to replace existing rechargeable and non-rechargeable battery technology in a variety of applications. The company's safe power solutions include devices such as notebook PCs, military radios, and other power-hungry computer, entertainment and communications products. It has developed two classes of fuel cells: PowerChip and BuzzCell suite of products. The PowerChip is a silicon based fuel cell that uses traditional computer chip manufacturing to build the fuel cell. The BuzzCell suit of product uses air from the surrounding environment and is targeted for consumer-oriented and less aggressive applications for lower power ranges. The Company is also developing Formira, a reformer platform for direct on-site generation of hydrogen gas. Neah Power Systems was founded by Leroy Ohlsen and Michael Fabian in 1999 and is headquartered in Bothell, WA.

            
            (See Full Profile)


  



 


Competitors




Name
Chg %
Market Cap




IntriCon Corp.
-1.44%
$53.38M


NL Industries Inc.
-0.68%
$360.42M


SCI Engineered Materials Inc.
-3.53%
$3.37M


Plug Power Inc.
15.09%
$473.69M


Ideal Power Inc.
12.93%
$32.47M




Competitor Data Provided By


   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





ATVI

-0.25%








KMX

2.66%








GES

-1.56%








MA

0.62%








KTOS

0.41%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.













Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert



















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




4:52 AM EDT
July 22, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
8:34pCharges dropped after ‘London Whale’ accused Jamie Dimon of making him a fall guy
7:41pGoodbye, Sean Spicer: Memorable Moments From the Podium  
7:18pHow to Fix Wall Street, and Bankers' Pay
6:59pAmazon, Whole Foods look to head off lengthy deal review
6:45pHawaii adopts emergency plan for North Korea missile attack
6:24p California Wildfire Destroys Homes Near Yosemite
6:20pSpicer Quits as Scaramucci Accepts White House Job
6:20pWhy you shouldn’t order ice on a flight, and other ‘dirty little secrets’ 
6:09pIf you’re reading this, you have a 19.3% chance of being rich
6:07p5 unfortunate reasons why millennials can’t have nice things (or save any money)
6:06pThis is the deadliest time of your life to put on weight
6:06pIf, like Sean Spicer, you suddenly walk out — what should you do next?
5:37pA History of Sears: Through Highs and Lows
5:13pAre you a money bully?
5:10pHow real-estate TV shows determine what home buyers look for and what to do if you decide to quit your job like Sean Spicer
5:07pBREAKINGWall Street's 'fear gauge'--the VIX--just logged its second-lowest close in history
5:06pWhy it might be time to invest in the companies Amazon is destroying
5:06pThis is what should really worry you about stocks
5:04pBeware of the curse of the number 7 in the stock market 
5:00pS&P 500, Nasdaq post weekly gains as stock market finishes session lower
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert



















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




4:52 AM EDT
July 22, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
8:34pCharges dropped after ‘London Whale’ accused Jamie Dimon of making him a fall guy
7:41pGoodbye, Sean Spicer: Memorable Moments From the Podium  
7:18pHow to Fix Wall Street, and Bankers' Pay
6:59pAmazon, Whole Foods look to head off lengthy deal review
6:45pHawaii adopts emergency plan for North Korea missile attack
6:24p California Wildfire Destroys Homes Near Yosemite
6:20pSpicer Quits as Scaramucci Accepts White House Job
6:20pWhy you shouldn’t order ice on a flight, and other ‘dirty little secrets’ 
6:09pIf you’re reading this, you have a 19.3% chance of being rich
6:07p5 unfortunate reasons why millennials can’t have nice things (or save any money)
6:06pThis is the deadliest time of your life to put on weight
6:06pIf, like Sean Spicer, you suddenly walk out — what should you do next?
5:37pA History of Sears: Through Highs and Lows
5:13pAre you a money bully?
5:10pHow real-estate TV shows determine what home buyers look for and what to do if you decide to quit your job like Sean Spicer
5:07pBREAKINGWall Street's 'fear gauge'--the VIX--just logged its second-lowest close in history
5:06pWhy it might be time to invest in the companies Amazon is destroying
5:06pThis is what should really worry you about stocks
5:04pBeware of the curse of the number 7 in the stock market 
5:00pS&P 500, Nasdaq post weekly gains as stock market finishes session lower
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks/Country/United States Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert



















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Location: United States



Name
Exchange
Sector




01 Communique Laboratory Inc. (OCQLF)
OOTC
Software


1347 Property Insurance Holdings Inc. (PIH)
XNAS
Non-Life Insurance


1-800-FLOWERS.COM Inc. Cl A (FLWS)
XNAS
Specialty Retail


1pm Industries Inc. (OPMZ)
OOTC
Food Products


1st Capital Bank (CA) (FISB)
OOTC
Banking


1st Constitution Bancorp (FCCY)
XNAS
Banking


1st NRG Corp. (FNRC)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


1st Source Corp. (SRCE)
XNAS
Banking


2050 Motors Inc. (ETFM)
OOTC
Automobiles


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl A (FOXA)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl B (FOX)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21Vianet Group Inc. ADR (VNET)
XNAS
Internet/Online


22nd Century Group Inc. (XXII)
XASE
Biotechnology


24/7 Kid Doc Inc. (TVMD)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


2U Inc. (TWOU)
XNAS
Software


2xLeveraged Long E-TRACS Linked to Wells Fargo Business Development Co. Index 052441 (BDCL)
ARCX
Major International Banks


2xLeveraged Long ETRACS Wells Fargo Business Development (LBDC)
ARCX
Major International Banks


3D Eye Solutions Inc. (TDEY)
OOTC
Motion Picture/Sound Recording


3D Pioneer Systems Inc. (DPSM)
OOTC
Software


3D Systems Corp. (DDD)
XNYS
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3DIcon Corp. (TDCP)
OOTC
Software


3Dshopping.com (THDS)
OOTC
Mixed Retailing


3DX Industries Inc. (DDDX)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3i Group PLC ADR (TGOPY)
OOTC
Finance Companies


3M Co. (MMM)
XNYS
Diversified Holding Companies


3Pea International Inc. (TPNL)
XOTC
Accounting


3Power Energy Group Inc. (PSPW)
OOTC
Renewable Energy Generation


3TL Technologies Corp. (TTMZF)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


420 Property Management Inc. (FTPM)
OOTC
Real Estate Agents/Brokers


4Cable TV International Inc. (CATV)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


4Licensing Corp. (FOURQ)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


500.com Ltd. ADR (WBAI)
XNYS
Gambling Industries


51job Inc. ADR (JOBS)
XNAS
Employment/Training Services


58.com Inc. ADR (WUBA)
XNYS
Consumer Services


5Barz International Inc. (BARZ)
OOTC
Networking


5N Plus Inc. (FPLSF)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


6D Global Technologies Inc. (SIXD)
OOTC
Computer Services


808 Renewable Energy Corp. (RNWR)
OOTC
Multiutilities


88 Energy Ltd. ADR (TNGRY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


888 Holdings PLC (EIHDF)
OOTC
Gambling Industries


8Point3 Energy Partners LP (CAFD)
XNAS
Renewable Energy Generation


8X8 Inc. (EGHT)
XNAS
Wired Telecommunications Services


A Clean Slate Inc. (DRWN)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


A&W Revenue Royalties Income Fund (AWRRF)
OOTC
Restaurants


A. H. Belo Corp. Series A (AHC)
XNYS
Publishing


A. Schulman Inc. (SHLM)
XNAS
Commodity Chemicals


A. Schulman Inc. 6% Pfd. (SLMNP)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


A.D. Makepeace Co. (MAKE)
OOTC
Farming


A.M. Castle & Co. (CAS)
XNYS
Wholesalers


A.O. Smith Corp. (AOS)
XNYS
Building Materials/Products


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S ADR (AMKBY)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series A (AMKAF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series B (AMKBF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.S. Roma S.p.A. (ASRAF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


A-1 Group Inc. (AWON)
OOTC
Tobacco


A10 Networks Inc. (ATEN)
XNYS
Computer Services


a2 Milk Co. Ltd. (ACOPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


AAC Holdings Inc. (AAC)
XNYS
Healthcare Provision


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. (AACAF)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. ADR (AACAY)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAON Inc. (AAON)
XNAS
Building Materials/Products


AAP Inc. (AAPJ)
OOTC
Food Products


AAR Corp. (AIR)
XNYS
Aerospace Products/Parts


Aaron's Inc. (AAN)
XNYS
Consumer Services


AB Science S.A. (ABSCF)
OOTC
Pharmaceuticals


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Biofuels Index Total Return (FUE)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Grain Index Total Return (GRU)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB&T Financial Corp. (ABTO)
OOTC
Banking


Abacus Mining & Exploration Corp. (ABCFF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abakan Inc. (ABKI)
OOTC
Industrial Products


Abattis Bioceuticals Corp. (ATTBF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abaxis Inc. (ABAX)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


ABB Ltd. (ABLZF)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABB Ltd. ADR (ABB)
XNYS
Industrial Machinery


Abbott Laboratories (ABT)
XNYS
Pharmaceuticals


AbbVie Inc. (ABBV)
XNYS
Biotechnology


Abby Inc. (ABBY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


Abcam PLC (ABCZF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abcam PLC ADR (ABCZY)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABCO Energy Inc. (ABCE)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


Abcourt Mines Inc. (ABMBF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aben Resources Ltd. (ABNAF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abengoa S.A. B (AGOAF)
OOTC
Construction


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. (ABEO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. Wt (ABEOW)
XNAS



Abercrombie & Fitch Co. (ANF)
XNYS
Clothing Retail


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Fund Inc. (FAX)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Investment Co. Ltd. (ABAKF)
OOTC
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC (ABDNF)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC ADR (ABDNY)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Australia Equity Fund Inc. (IAF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Chile Fund Inc. (CH)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Emerging Markets Smaller Company Opportunities Fund Inc. (ABE)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Global Income Fund Inc. (FCO)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Greater China Fund Inc. (GCH)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Indonesia Fund Inc. (IF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen International Inc. (AABVF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aberdeen Israel Fund Inc. (ISL)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. (JEQ)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Latin America Equity Fund Inc. (LAQ)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Singapore Fund Inc. (SGF)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Abertis Infraestructuras S.A. ADR (ABRTY)
OOTC
Transportation Services


Ability Inc. (ABIL)
XNAS
Precision Products


Ability Inc. Wt (ABIWF)
OOTC



Abiomed Inc. (ABMD)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Abitibi Royalties Inc. (ATBYF)
OOTC
General Mining


Able Energy Inc. (ABLE)
OOTC
Gas Utilities


Ablynx N.V. (ABLYF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABM Industries Inc. (ABM)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Abraxas Petroleum Corp. (AXAS)
XNAS
Oil Extraction


Absecon Bancorp (ASCN)
OOTC
Banking


Absolute Health & Fitness Inc. (AHFI)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Absolute Software Corp. (ALSWF)
OOTC
Software


ABT Holdings Inc. (ABOT)
OOTC
Precious Metals


Abtech Holdings Inc. (ABHD)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABV Consulting Inc. (ABVN)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


AC Immune S.A. (ACIU)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acacia Communications Inc. (ACIA)
XNAS
Networking


Acacia Diversified Holdings Inc. (ACCA)
OOTC
Specialty Retail


Acacia Mining PLC (ABGLF)
OOTC
Gold


Acacia Research Corp. - Acacia Technologies (ACTG)
XNAS
Diversified Business Services


Acadia Healthcare Co. Inc. (ACHC)
XNAS
Healthcare Provision


ACADIA Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACAD)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acadia Realty Trust (AKR)
XNYS



Acadian Timber Corp. (ACAZF)
OOTC
Forestry & Wood Products


Acasti Pharma Inc. (ACST)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Accelera Innovations Inc. (ACNV)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accelerate Diagnostics Inc. (AXDX)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accelerize Inc. (ACLZ)
XOTC
Life Insurance


Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accenture PLC Cl A (ACN)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Access National Corp. (ANCX)
XNAS
Banking


Access Power Inc. (ACCR)
OOTC
Wired Telecommunications Services


Access Worldwide Communications Inc. (AWWC)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


Acciona S.A. (ACXIF)
OOTC
Construction


ACCO Brands Corp. (ACCO)
XNYS
Nondurable Household Products


Accor S.A. (ACRFF)
OOTC
Hotels


Accor S.A. ADR (ACCYY)
OOTC
Hotels


Accordia Golf Co. Ltd. (ACGFF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Accredited Mortgage Loan REIT Trust 9.75% Perp. Cum. Pfd. Series A (AHHAP)
OOTC
Mortgages


Accretive Health Inc. (ACHI)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accuray Inc. (ARAY)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Accuride Corp. (ACW)
XNYS
Auto & Commercial Vehicle Parts


AcelRx Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACRX)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Acer Inc. GDR Reg S (ACEYY)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


Acerus Pharmaceuticals Corp. (TRLPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Aceto Corp. (ACET)
XNAS
Specialty Chemicals


Achaogen Inc. (AKAO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Achillion Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACHN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


ACI Worldwide Inc. (ACIW)
XNAS
Software



«1234567891011-2021-3031-4041-5051-6061-7071-8081-9091-94»










Log In




4:52 AM EDT
July 22, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
8:34pCharges dropped after ‘London Whale’ accused Jamie Dimon of making him a fall guy
7:41pGoodbye, Sean Spicer: Memorable Moments From the Podium  
7:18pHow to Fix Wall Street, and Bankers' Pay
6:59pAmazon, Whole Foods look to head off lengthy deal review
6:45pHawaii adopts emergency plan for North Korea missile attack
6:24p California Wildfire Destroys Homes Near Yosemite
6:20pSpicer Quits as Scaramucci Accepts White House Job
6:20pWhy you shouldn’t order ice on a flight, and other ‘dirty little secrets’ 
6:09pIf you’re reading this, you have a 19.3% chance of being rich
6:07p5 unfortunate reasons why millennials can’t have nice things (or save any money)
6:06pThis is the deadliest time of your life to put on weight
6:06pIf, like Sean Spicer, you suddenly walk out — what should you do next?
5:37pA History of Sears: Through Highs and Lows
5:13pAre you a money bully?
5:10pHow real-estate TV shows determine what home buyers look for and what to do if you decide to quit your job like Sean Spicer
5:07pBREAKINGWall Street's 'fear gauge'--the VIX--just logged its second-lowest close in history
5:06pWhy it might be time to invest in the companies Amazon is destroying
5:06pThis is what should really worry you about stocks
5:04pBeware of the curse of the number 7 in the stock market 
5:00pS&P 500, Nasdaq post weekly gains as stock market finishes session lower
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































NPWZ Stock Price - Neah Power Systems Inc. Stock Quote (U.S.: OTC) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,580.07


-31.71


-0.15%











S&P 500

2,472.54


-0.91


-0.04%











Nasdaq

6,387.75


-2.25


-0.04%











GlobalDow

2,833.20


-8.47


-0.30%











Gold

1,261.10


9.00


0.72%











Oil

45.60


-1.32


-2.81%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



CTAS 
9.2




COF 
8.6




ETFC 
5.1




SYF 
4.5






HP
-5.5




ISRG
-4.6




HBAN
-4.4




CHK
-3.1














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








07/21

Charges dropped after ‘London Whale’ accused Jamie Dimon of making him a fall guy



07/21

Goodbye, Sean Spicer: Memorable Moments From the Podium  



07/21

How to Fix Wall Street, and Bankers' Pay



07/21

Amazon, Whole Foods look to head off lengthy deal review



07/21

Hawaii adopts emergency plan for North Korea missile attack



07/21

 California Wildfire Destroys Homes Near Yosemite



07/21

Spicer Quits as Scaramucci Accepts White House Job



07/21

Updated
Why you shouldn’t order ice on a flight, and other ‘dirty little secrets’ 



07/21

Updated
If you’re reading this, you have a 19.3% chance of being rich



07/21

Updated
5 unfortunate reasons why millennials can’t have nice things (or save any money)












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


NPWZ


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors

 



NPWZ
U.S.: OTC


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Neah Power Systems Inc.

Watchlist 
CreateNPWZAlert



  


Closed

Last Updated: Jul 21, 2017 5:20 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
0.0012



-0.0001
-7.69%






Previous Close




$0.0013





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




29.88% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    2.8M
                


                65 Day Avg. - 9.5M
            





Open: 0.0013
Close: 0.0012



0.0011
Day Low/High
0.0013





Day Range



0.0002
52 Week Low/High
0.0031


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$0.0013



Day Range
0.0011 - 0.0013



52 Week Range
0.0002 - 0.0031



Market Cap
$2.93M



Shares Outstanding
2.25B



Public Float
2.25B



Beta
n/a



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
$0.00



Yield
n/a



Dividend
n/a



Ex-Dividend Date
n/a



Short Interest
n/a
n/a


% of Float Shorted
n/a



Average Volume
9.46M




 


Performance




5 Day


140.00%







1 Month


300.00%







3 Month


9.09%







YTD


144.90%







1 Year


500.00%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones




No Headlines Available




No Headlines Available











Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






10-Q: NEAH POWER SYSTEMS, INC.


Aug. 22, 2016 at 4:43 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Neah Power: A Fast-Growing Fuel-Cell Name


Jan. 23, 2014 at 12:41 p.m. ET
on Wall St. Cheat Sheet









Further Clarification From Neah Power Systems, Inc. Regarding Filing of Form 15 to Voluntarily Suspend Its SEC Reporting Obligations
Further Clarification From Neah Power Systems, Inc. Regarding Filing of Form 15 to Voluntarily Suspend Its SEC Reporting Obligations

May. 17, 2017 at 4:32 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Neah Power Systems, Inc. Announces Filing of Form 15 to Voluntarily Suspend Its SEC Reporting Obligations
Neah Power Systems, Inc. Announces Filing of Form 15 to Voluntarily Suspend Its SEC Reporting Obligations

May. 15, 2017 at 4:00 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Neah Power Systems Company Update - March 2017


Mar. 27, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Global Rechargeable Batteries Industry


Jan. 9, 2017 at 11:37 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Neah Power Systems Company Update - November 2016


Nov. 3, 2016 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





ReportLinker Review:  Global Rechargeable Batteries Industry


Sep. 26, 2016 at 7:06 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Global Consumer Batteries Industry


Sep. 22, 2016 at 7:01 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Fuel-Cell Power Based Battery Solutions Growth Propelled Via Federally Approved Grants Targeting Research And Development of Batteries with Microchip Technology


Aug. 23, 2016 at 8:50 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Neah Power Systems Wins U. S. Department of Energy Grant for Lithium Metal Battery


Aug. 23, 2016 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF











Neah Power Systems Inc.


            
            Neah Power Systems, Inc. engages in the development and sale of renewable energy solutions using proprietary fuel cell technology. Its fuel cells are designed to replace existing rechargeable and non-rechargeable battery technology in a variety of applications. The company's safe power solutions include devices such as notebook PCs, military radios, and other power-hungry computer, entertainment and communications products. It has developed two classes of fuel cells: PowerChip and BuzzCell suite of products. The PowerChip is a silicon based fuel cell that uses traditional computer chip manufacturing to build the fuel cell. The BuzzCell suit of product uses air from the surrounding environment and is targeted for consumer-oriented and less aggressive applications for lower power ranges. The Company is also developing Formira, a reformer platform for direct on-site generation of hydrogen gas. Neah Power Systems was founded by Leroy Ohlsen and Michael Fabian in 1999 and is headquartered in Bothell, WA.

            
            (See Full Profile)


  



 


Competitors




Name
Chg %
Market Cap




IntriCon Corp.
-1.44%
$53.38M


NL Industries Inc.
-0.68%
$360.42M


SCI Engineered Materials Inc.
-3.53%
$3.37M


Plug Power Inc.
15.09%
$473.69M


Ideal Power Inc.
12.93%
$32.47M




Competitor Data Provided By


   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





ATVI

-0.25%








KMX

2.66%








GES

-1.56%








MA

0.62%








SRPT

6.06%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.














    NPWZ Key Statistics - Neah Power Systems Inc. Financial Ratios - MarketWatch




































Bulletin






Investor Alert





















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Neah Power Systems Inc.

                  OTC: NPWZ
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Neah Power Systems Inc.



Market closed
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 21, 2017, 5:20 p.m.


NPWZ

/quotes/zigman/4160809/delayed


$
0.0012




Change

-0.0001
-7.69%

Volume
Volume 2.83m
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/4160809/delayed
Previous close

$
			0.0013
		


$
				0.0012
			
Change

-0.0001
-7.69%





Day low
Day high
$0.0011
$0.0013










52 week low
52 week high

            $0.0002
        

            $0.0031
        

















			Company Description 


			Neah Power Systems, Inc. engages in the development and sale of renewable energy solutions using proprietary fuel cell technology. Its fuel cells are designed to replace existing rechargeable and non-rechargeable battery technology in a variety of applications. The company's safe power solutions inc...
		


                Neah Power Systems, Inc. engages in the development and sale of renewable energy solutions using proprietary fuel cell technology. Its fuel cells are designed to replace existing rechargeable and non-rechargeable battery technology in a variety of applications. The company's safe power solutions include devices such as notebook PCs, military radios, and other power-hungry computer, entertainment and communications products. It has developed two classes of fuel cells: PowerChip and BuzzCell suite of products. The PowerChip is a silicon based fuel cell that uses traditional computer chip manufacturing to build the fuel cell. The BuzzCell suit of product uses air from the surrounding environment and is targeted for consumer-oriented and less aggressive applications for lower power ranges. The Company is also developing Formira, a reformer platform for direct on-site generation of hydrogen gas. Neah Power Systems was founded by Leroy Ohlsen and Michael Fabian in 1999 and is headquartered in Bothell, WA.
            




Valuation

P/E Current
-0.32


P/E Ratio (with extraordinary items)
-0.74


Price to Sales Ratio
15.15


Enterprise Value to EBITDA
-0.52


Total Debt to Enterprise Value
0.22

Efficiency

Revenue/Employee
65,358.00


Income Per Employee
-1,454,525.00


Receivables Turnover
62.25


Total Asset Turnover
0.37

Liquidity

Current Ratio
0.04


Quick Ratio
0.04


Cash Ratio
0.01



Profitability

Gross Margin
88.18


Operating Margin
-1,888.27


Pretax Margin
-2,225.48


Net Margin
-2,225.48


Return on Assets
-828.10

Capital Structure

Total Debt to Total Assets
280.79





      Officers and Executives
    



Name
Age
Officer Since
Title





Mr. Paul  Sidlo 
-
2017
Chairman



Dr. Gerard Chris D'Couto 
49
2007
President, CEO, Director & CAO



Mr. Jeffrey A. May 
59
2014
Chief Financial Officer



Mr. William M. Shenkin 
55
2013
Independent Director



Mr. Jon M. Garfield 
50
2008
Independent Director





Insider Actions


 – Purchase

 – Sale
1
 – Number of Transactions











{"OrganizationDocuments":[{"Documents":[{"document":[{"reportDateGroup":[{"reportDate":"2011-06-09","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"3","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-16","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-13","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-12","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-11","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-02","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-03-10","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"4","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-15","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]}]}]}]}]}


Date
Name
Shares
Transaction
Value





09/24/2014

William M. Shenkin 
Director

5,000


 
Disposition at $0.01 per share.


50


09/16/2014

William M. Shenkin 
Director

200,000


 
Disposition at $0.01 per share.


2,000


09/15/2014

William M. Shenkin 
Director

35,000


 
Disposition at $0.01 per share.


350


09/12/2014

William M. Shenkin 
Director

100,000


 
Disposition at $0.01 per share.


1,000


09/11/2014

William M. Shenkin 
Director

39,200


 
Disposition at $0.01 per share.


392


09/09/2014

William M. Shenkin 
Director

827,995


 
Disposition at $0.01 per share.


8,279


09/08/2014

William M. Shenkin 
Director

863,800


 
Disposition at $0.02 per share.


17,276


09/04/2014

William M. Shenkin 
Director

2,800,000


 
Disposition at $0.01 per share.


28,000


09/04/2014

William M. Shenkin 
Director

53,289


 
Disposition at $0.01 per share.


532


08/29/2014

William M. Shenkin 
Director

1,100,000


 
Disposition at $0.01 per share.


11,000


07/26/2013

Jeffrey B. Sakaguchi 
Director

10,395,010


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0








/news/latest/company/us/npwz

      MarketWatch News on NPWZ
    
No News currently available for NPWZ





/news/nonmarketwatch/company/us/npwz

      Other News on NPWZ
    




 10-Q: NEAH POWER SYSTEMS, INC.
4:43 p.m. Aug. 22, 2016
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Neah Power: A Fast-Growing Fuel-Cell Name

1:41 p.m. Jan. 23, 2014
 - Wall St. Cheat Sheet














At a Glance

Neah Power Systems, Inc.
22118 20th Avenue SE
Suite 142

Bothell, Washington 98021




Phone
1 4254243324


Industry
Industrial Electronics


Sector
Industrial Goods


Fiscal Year-end
09/2016


View SEC Filings




Revenue
$196,073


Net Income
$-4.36M


2015 Sales Growth 
10872.2%


Employees

        3.00


Annual Report for NPWZ











/news/pressrelease/company/us/npwz

      Press Releases on NPWZ
    




 Further Clarification From Neah Power Systems, Inc. Regarding Filing of Form 15 to Voluntarily Suspend Its SEC Reporting Obligations
4:32 p.m. May 17, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Neah Power Systems, Inc. Announces Filing of Form 15 to Voluntarily Suspend Its SEC Reporting Obligations
4:00 p.m. May 15, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Neah Power Systems Company Update - March 2017
8:00 a.m. March 27, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Global Rechargeable Batteries Industry
12:37 p.m. Jan. 9, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Neah Power Systems Company Update - November 2016
8:00 a.m. Nov. 3, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 ReportLinker Review:  Global Rechargeable Batteries Industry
7:06 p.m. Sept. 26, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Global Consumer Batteries Industry
7:01 p.m. Sept. 22, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Fuel-Cell Power Based Battery Solutions Growth Propelled Via Federally Approved Grants Targeting Research And Development of Batteries with Microchip Technology
8:50 a.m. Aug. 23, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Neah Power Systems Wins U. S. Department of Energy Grant for Lithium Metal Battery
8:00 a.m. Aug. 23, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF











Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




4:52 AM EDT
July 22, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
8:34pCharges dropped after ‘London Whale’ accused Jamie Dimon of making him a fall guy
7:41pGoodbye, Sean Spicer: Memorable Moments From the Podium  
7:18pHow to Fix Wall Street, and Bankers' Pay
6:59pAmazon, Whole Foods look to head off lengthy deal review
6:45pHawaii adopts emergency plan for North Korea missile attack
6:24p California Wildfire Destroys Homes Near Yosemite
6:20pSpicer Quits as Scaramucci Accepts White House Job
6:20pWhy you shouldn’t order ice on a flight, and other ‘dirty little secrets’ 
6:09pIf you’re reading this, you have a 19.3% chance of being rich
6:07p5 unfortunate reasons why millennials can’t have nice things (or save any money)
6:06pThis is the deadliest time of your life to put on weight
6:06pIf, like Sean Spicer, you suddenly walk out — what should you do next?
5:37pA History of Sears: Through Highs and Lows
5:13pAre you a money bully?
5:10pHow real-estate TV shows determine what home buyers look for and what to do if you decide to quit your job like Sean Spicer
5:07pBREAKINGWall Street's 'fear gauge'--the VIX--just logged its second-lowest close in history
5:06pWhy it might be time to invest in the companies Amazon is destroying
5:06pThis is what should really worry you about stocks
5:04pBeware of the curse of the number 7 in the stock market 
5:00pS&P 500, Nasdaq post weekly gains as stock market finishes session lower
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15












































































 



 Neah Power Systems, Inc.: June 2015 Update to Shareholders - Continued Commercialization and 
         










    










 






 











 









Neah Power Systems, Inc.: June 2015 Update to Shareholders - Continued Commercialization and Product Progress

Jul 20, 2015, 07:45 ET
		  		  						
						 from   Neah Power Systems, Inc. 











 
















































 

 




















 


BOTHELL, Wash., Jul. 20, 2015 /PRNewswire/ --Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ) (OTC: NPWZ) - To Our Shareholders:
As a supplement to our latest quarterly filing, and follow on to the previous letter to shareholders, I want to provide you with a brief report on the status of our Company operations as well as relate the progress achieved by our management in advancing efforts to commercialize, license and sell NEAH Power's industry leading technologies and products. Some of our other communication forums were not as effective, in our opinion, so we will communicate directly to you through monthly shareholder letters, as well as responding to valid queries directed to the Company (info@neahpower.com)   
Status of the Clear Path Teaming Agreement
We recently reported a teaming agreement with Clear Path Technologies related to security and defense applications. We are pleased with the progress in deploying the Formira HOD technologies for a variety of applications in the MENA (Middle East North Africa) regions. We have submitted quotations for potential multi-million dollar opportunities. 

We have assembled and continue to run five 100W reformer units to baseline and optimize performance. We are sharing the specifications with customers and partners under non-disclosure agreement. These five units are helping us scale up the systems to larger (1000+ W) units as well. 
As  previously discussed, we are finalizing a date with Tectonica to demonstrate our product for certain defense applications in Australia. 
We are working with Silent Falcon to integrate the fuel cell into their fixed wing drone. 
We will keep you updated on these exciting developments.  
Status of the Shorai Acquisition
We previously announced the signing of a definitive agreement to merge with Shorai, Inc., with a targeted completion date of July 15 2015.  While we had all expected the transaction to be completed by now and be well into the integration of the two companies, both parties continue to support the business combination, as evidenced by the signing of multiple extensions in order to consummate the transaction, which requires a capitalization event.  Neah has a several Term Sheets from funders and expects to complete a transaction as soon as practicable.  
The acquisition of Shorai is expected to be immediately accretive with Shorai reporting $4 million (unaudited) revenue for the twelve months ended December 2014 and positive cash flow in 4Q 2014.  Once acquired, our combined operations will enjoy access to broader markets, new product offerings, and supply chain and operational synergies that are expected to create value for our company, our shareholders, and our customer base.
PowerChip® Fuel Cell Product Acceptance
We recently announced the successful completion of testing of three PowerChip® units with the Defense Research and Development Organization (DRDO) of the Government of India. These units were manufactured and shipped against a traditional open purchase order, and subsequently paid for.  Product testing, qualification and acceptance by a third party (a government owned entity) were completed December 2014.  This is significant because this was to be final hurdle that would result in a commercial relationship with the government of India.  The dismissal of the DRDO Chief earlier this year in February (January) caused a delay of advancement for various projects, Neah's being one of them.  The recent appointments at the DRDO last month should facilitate a closing of our ongoing commercial arrangement with the Indian Government in short order.
Formira HODTM (Hydrogen on Demand) 
Our Formira HODTM fuel cell continues to demonstrate best-in-class performance. We are in preliminary discussions with several leading manufacturers of unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs), remote robotic vehicles, automotive, rail, off-grid power, and medical device companies.  The Formira HODTM fuel cell has been proven as a safe, cost-effective and energy dense solution for the production of hydrogen for a variety of applications.  It surpasses other sources of energy like compressed hydrogen, the most commonly used method of utilizing hydrogen to generate energy.  We are presently designing the Formira HODTM system into UAVs with Silent Falcon, and Tectonica is coordinating with an Australia defense customer the timing for a demo in Australia. We have provided several Request for Quotes ("RFQs") to potential  customers, which we hope to convert to commercial business.
BuzzBar Suite Gen 2 & Gen 3 (as previously reported)
To date, NEAH Power has shipped all of the orders that we received through the website and our Indiegogo campaign.  We also have presented the product to various big box retailers and end users, and have aggregated the feedback from them into BuzzBar Gen 3.  Our Gen 3 BuzzBar has received very good reviews.  Pending the completion of a satisfactory capital raise and upon completing the Shorai Acquisition, we expect shipping of the Gen 3 BuzzBar to commence later this year.  Our objective is to leverage the Shorai brand and marketing prowess to launch the Gen 3 in a most significant way!
We look forward to announcing more exciting news and milestones very soon!  As we develop the numerous opportunities at hand, expand our business development efforts going forward, and secure the necessary capital to fully execute our plan, management will continue working hard to accomplish the mission.  Our success is only achieved with the tireless work of our employees, the support of our shareholders, the diligent governance of our Board of Directors, and the expert guidance of our Strategic Advisory Board.  Thank you for your trust and loyalty.  
Best Regards,
Chris D'CoutoPresident & CEONeah Power Systems
Forward Looking Statements
Certain of the statements contained herein may be, within the meaning of the federal securities laws, "forward-looking statements," which are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements, and the Company does not undertake any responsibility to update any of these statements in the future. Please read Neah Power System's Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2014 and its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC during fiscal 2015 for a discussion of such risks, uncertainties and other factors.
For more information please contact the Company at Neah Power Systems Inc.info@neahpower.com+1-425-424-3324 ext. 105
 SOURCE  Neah Power Systems, Inc.  




  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  











Oct 20, 2015, 07:45 ET
Preview: Neah Power Systems Releases Improved Formira Hydrogen-on-Demand Product













Jun 05, 2015, 07:30 ET
Preview: NEAH Power Systems to Provide Energy Solutions For Global Security and Defense Market






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Read More





Mar 27, 2017, 08:00 ET
Further Clarification From Neah Power Systems, Inc. Regarding...








Mar 27, 2017, 08:00 ET
Neah Power Systems, Inc. Announces Filing of Form 15 to...








Mar 27, 2017, 08:00 ET
Neah Power Systems Company Update - March 2017











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 






 






Neah Power Systems, Inc. | Government Contractor







 








 






  yvbfwcwyvtydevrudz






					Government Contracts				

					Federal Agencies				



				More 





 Search






							Government Contractors							×














 
















Menu


See All Government Contractors
OverviewContractsCategoriesProducts/ServicesPlace of PerformanceVendor Details 








					Neah Power Systems, Inc.				


OverviewContractsCategoriesProducts/ServicesMorePlace of PerformanceVendor Details 








Neah Power Systems, Inc.



Overview




Contracts




Categories




Products/Services




Place of Performance




Vendor Details




References










 See all Government Contractors				

 Research Guide				




Share
















Neah Power Systems, Inc. Government Contractor in Bothell, WA

 






dollars obligated (Latest year)$1,174,987 United States Dollarslatest fiscal year2008total dollars obligated (Since FY2007)$2,551,765 United States Dollarsnumber of contracts (Since FY2007)2 

 

See all Contracts for this Company See all Government Contractors 












Advertisement


ShareOverviewSummaryNeah Power Systems, Inc. has worked on two contracts worth $2.55 million USD in obligations from the federal government since FY2007. In its latest active fiscal year (2008), the organization received a total of $1.17 million USD in obligations.The sole agency it has contracted with is the Department of Defense.

Principal Agencies
Department of Defense


Principal Category (NAICS)
Research and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)


Principal Product or Service (PSC)
Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)


Designations
Small Business, Federally Funded Research and Development Corporation, For Profit Organization, Manufacturer of Goods, and Non-Tax Exempt Corporate Entity


Organization Type
Corporate Not Tax Exempt


Website
neahpower.com 
Contact

Phone Number
(425) 424-3324


Fax Number
(425) 483-8454
Location
How does Neah Power Systems, Inc. compare to other vendors?A comparison of the amount of contract awards obligated to Neah Power Systems, Inc. since FY2007 with other vendors in its location.Awarded far higher than average compared to  62 vendors in Zip Code 98021, WA.Awarded far higher than average compared to  1,156 vendors in Congressional District 1, WA.Awarded far higher than average compared to  13,313 vendors in Washington.Awarded far higher than average compared to all  494,388 federal vendors.


Comparison

Vendor NameTotal Dollars Obligated (Since FY2007)ZipcodeIDIDColorNeah Power Systems, Inc.$2.55 million USDZip Code 98021, WAZip Code 98021, WA Federal Contractors$115,936 USDCongressional District 1, WA Federal Contractors$50,417 USDWashington Federal Contractors$34,802 USDAll Federal Contractors$36,884 USD




ZipCongressional DistrictStateMoreZip



See all vendors from Zip Code 98021, WA ›Congressional District



See all vendors from Congressional District 1, WA ›State



See all vendors from Washington ›
 





Advertisement


ShareContractsBy Year

The federal government obligated Neah Power Systems, Inc. a high of $1.38 million USD in FY2007 and low of $1.17 million USD in FY2008.* Dollars Obligated: The amount of money obligated towards a vendor by a federal agency or agencies to work on a contract.* Base and All Options (Ceiling): The maximum amount that can be awarded to a contract as mutually agreed upon by the vendor and agency.



Fiscal YearTotal Dollars ObligatedTotal Base & All Options (Ceiling)ID20071,376,7781,376,77820081,174,9871,174,987200900

By Date Signed



Contract SearchContracts that Neah Power Systems, Inc. signed from FY2007 onwards.Most Recent

ContractContract DescriptionProduct or Service (PSC)Signed DateCompletion DateAgencyDollars ObligatedPercent ObligatedIDVendor NameN0001408C0474Type: Definitive Contract (1 year)RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT IN THE PHYSICAL, ENGINEERING, AND LIFE SCIENCES (EXCEPT BIOTECHNOLOGY)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)9/12/089/12/09Department of Defense$1,174,990 USD100% obligatedN0001407C0085Type: Definitive Contract (1 year)RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT IN THE PHYSICAL, ENGINEERING, AND LIFE SCIENCESDefense - Advanced Development (AD93)7/17/077/17/08Department of Defense$1,376,780 USD100% obligated

See all contracts for this vendor ›Related VendorsVendors with the same primary NAICS and PSC categorizations.

Title FieldTotal Dollars Obligated (Since FY2007)IDVendor NameMaine Marine Manufacturing Limited Liability Company in Portland, ME Contracts$7.12 million USDOn Time Systems, Inc in Eugene, OR Contracts$2.69 million USDNeah Power Systems, Inc. in Bothell, WA Contracts$2.55 million USDIi-Vi Incorporated in Saxonburg, PA Contracts$35 million USDMarine Autonomous Systems Engineering Inc in Honolulu, HI Contracts$485,952 USDCree Santa Barbara Technology Center in Goleta, CA Contracts$953,360 USDDiffusion Pharmaceuticals Llc in Charlottesville, VA Contracts$454,478 USDTechnology Systems, Inc in Brunswick, ME Contracts$7.72 million USDFredco Miltech Llc in Kissimmee, FL Contracts$96,462 USDBloom Energy Corporation in Sunnyvale, CA Contracts$9.43 million USD

Help us Improve!




Submit






Submit

 





Advertisement


ShareCategories ProcuredWhen the Federal government intends to acquire goods or services, it identifies the NAICS code that describes the principal purpose of that procurement. NAICS is production oriented (not product oriented) and categorizes businesses with others that have similar methods of production.Since FY2007, Neah Power Systems, Inc. has been engaged in procurements with the following NAICS codes:





Category (NAICS)Total Dollars ObligatedIDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)1,376,778Research and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)1,174,987

DestinationThe dollars obligated to Neah Power Systems, Inc. to fulfill procurements by NAICS category, along with the federal agencies that procured them. Hover over the visualization for more detail.





Category (NAICS)Total Dollars ObligatedIDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)1,376,778Research and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)1,174,987

Comparison



Vendor NameDollars Obligated (Latest Year)IDIDColorNeah Power Systems, Inc.$1.17 million USDAll Research and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710) Vendors in Washington$11,996 USDAll Research and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710) Vendors$11,000 USD




Higher Than AverageThe principal NAICS category of Neah Power Systems, Inc. is Research and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710) as measured by the total amount obligated in contract awards to the vendor since FY2007.In its latest full year of contract work (FY2008), Neah Power Systems, Inc. was obligated a total of $1.17M, an amount that was far higher than the average vendor from Washington specializing in Research and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences and far higher than all vendors in the U.S. classified by this NAICS category.
Other Research and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences Vendors in Washington

Vendor NameLocationDollars Obligated (Latest Year)Principal Category (NAICS)Principal Product or Service (PSC)Latest Fiscal YearIDStateSeattle Biomedical Research InstituteSeattle, WA$5.07 million USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Biomedical - Basic Research (AN11)2016Earth And Space ResearchSeattle, WA$1.76 million USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Research and Development - Basic Research (AZ11)2016Neah Power Systems, Inc.Bothell, WA$1.17 million USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2008Paradigm Optics, IncorporatedVancouver, WA$499,946 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Research and Development - Applied Research/Exploratory Development (AZ12)2009Stresswave, Inc.Tukwila, WA$255,850 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Defense Aircraft - Management and Support (AC16)2007H D LaboratoriesIssaquah, WA$178,888 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Research and Development - Applied Research/Exploratory Development (AZ12)2007Ramgen Power Systems, LlcBellevue, WA$150,000 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Defense - Applied Research/Exploratory Development (AD92)2008Scion Associates, IncorporatedPort Townsend, WA$106,000 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Defense - Basic Research (AD91)2011The Eros Group LLCWoodinville, WA$99,740 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Defense Electronics and Communication Equipment - Basic Research (AC61)2008Center For Whale ResearchFriday Harbor, WA$97,891 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Animal and Fisheries Studies (B516)2016Mechmath LlcFederal Way, WA$79,937 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Defense Ships - Basic Research (AC31)2012Leak Indicator Paint SystTacoma, WA$69,665 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Pollution Control and Abatement - Basic Research (AH11)2007Axio Research, LlcyvbfwcwyvtydevrudzSeattle, WA$58,311 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Biomedical - Basic Research (AN11)2009Kamada Science & DesignBellingham, WA$56,436 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Air Quality Analyses (B502)2007Seattle Sensor Systems CorporationSeattle, WA$39,295 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Research and Development - Basic Research (AZ11)2015Aerojet-General CorporationRedmond, WA$24,697 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Defense Missile and Space Systems - Applied Research/Exploratory Development (AC22)2016U S Ecology, Inc (Ca)Olympia, WA$15,592 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Professional Services (R499)2007Kristin LaidreSeattle, WA$15,000 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Professional Services (R499)2007Gillespie RobertEast Wenatchee, WA$15,000 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Endangered Species Studies - Plant and Animal (B509)2007New Light Industries, Ltd.Spokane, WA$13,327 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Defense - Applied Research/Exploratory Development (AD92)2008Jennifer ScheuerellSeattle, WA$13,200 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Professional Services (R499)2008Ethan WeltySeattle, WA$11,996 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Natural Resources and Conservation Services (F099)2007Florence BeckwithSeattle, WA$11,989 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Oceanological Studies (B526)2007Peter BryantBrush Prairie, WA$6,911 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Animal and Fisheries Studies (B516)2007Landis Eric DSeattle, WA$6,316 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Animal and Fisheries Studies (B516)2007

See all Research and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710) Vendors in Washington › 

 


InsideGov is a government research site that uses Graphiq’s semantic technology to deliver deep insights via data-driven articles, visualizations and research tools.


										Deep insights from government data. Knowledge delivered. ›
									









ShareProducts/Services ProcuredComparison



Vendor NameDollars Obligated (Latest Year)IDIDColorNeah Power Systems, Inc.$1.17 million USDAll Defense - Advanced Development (AD93) Vendors in Washington$376,920 USDAll Defense - Advanced Development (AD93) Vendors$247,470 USD




Higher Than AverageThe principal Product or Service Code (PSC) of Neah Power Systems, Inc. is Defense - Advanced Development (AD93) as measured by the total amount obligated in contract awards to the vendor since FY2007.In its latest full year of contract work (FY2008), Neah Power Systems, Inc. was obligated a total of $1.17M, an amount that was far higher than the average vendor from Washington specializing in Defense - Advanced Development and 4.7 times more than all vendors in the U.S. classified by this PSC.
Other Defense - Advanced Development Vendors in Washington

Vendor NameLocationDollars Obligated (Latest Year)Principal Category (NAICS)Principal Product or Service (PSC)Latest Fiscal YearIDStateSound Pharmaceuticals IncSeattle, WA$1.68 million USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2010Neah Power Systems, Inc.Bothell, WA$1.17 million USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (541710)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2008Leviathan Security Group, Inc.Seattle, WA$677,611 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2015Spaceflight Industries, Inc.Seattle, WA$665,233 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2016Moire' Inc.Issaquah, WA$422,180 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2016Vista Clara Inc.Mukilteo, WA$377,892 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2015Eagle Harbor Technologies IncSeattle, WA$375,948 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2016Infinia Technology CorporationyvbfwcwyvtydevrudzRichland, WA$164,936 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2016Intelligent Strategic Options LlcSeattle, WA$71,226 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2013Adaptive Cognitive Systems LlcBlaine, WA$69,994 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2015Triangle Telecommunications IncKent, WA$3,400 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2012Stirling Technology CoKennewick, WA-$7,715 USDResearch and Development in the Physical, Engineering, and Life Sciences (except Biotechnology) - except nanotechnology research and experimental development laboratories (541712)Defense - Advanced Development (AD93)2016

See all Defense - Advanced Development (AD93) Vendors in Washington › 





Advertisement


SharePlace of Performance
The location of the principal plant or place of business where Neah Power Systems, Inc. in Bothell, WA has had their items produced, supplied from stock, or services performed since FY2007.


ZipCongressional DistrictStateMoreZip



Congressional District



State






ZipcodeZip Code 98021, WACongressional DistrictCongressional District 1, WAStateWashington
 

 







ShareVendor DetailsVisit the full company profile of Neah Power Systems, Inc..Neah Power Systems, Inc. ()OverviewStockMoreOverview

Industry
Semiconductor and Other Electronic Component Manufacturing Companies


Total Employees
3


Revenue
$196,100 USD


Net Income
-$4.36 million USD
Stock

Observation DatePriceIDTicker SymbolJuly 21, 20170.0012July 20, 20170.0013July 19, 20170.001July 18, 20170.0009July 17, 20170.0006July 14, 20170.0005July 13, 20170.0006July 12, 20170.0005July 11, 20170.0005July 10, 20170.0004July 07, 20170.0006July 06, 20170.0006July 05, 20170.0005July 03, 20170.0004June 30, 20170.0003

 





Advertisement





×






References




Sources: Zacks Investment Research, FinancialContent, USASpending.gov, Rob J Hyndman, D&B, Localeze, and SEC. Show details  Hide details  







Was this page helpful?

Yes
No


 

BlkHol Email


Welcome to 
Hi! We see you would like to submit a rating. Please login or create an account to do so. Thank you!


Sign In With




Login with Google




Login with Facebook
 We'll never post without your permission.



Don't have an account?
Sign Up Now




Privacy
Terms & Conditions









						© 2017 Graphiq Inc. All Rights Reserved.
						
Support
Terms
Privacy
Ad Choices and Cookie Policy










 
 




 










Page not found - TheStreet

















 

 




















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street




































 
















Page not found

        Sorry, the page you're looking for is not available.
    
    You might want to try:
    

Our homepage


Our most popular stories






























 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 














	Neah Power Systems, Inc. (NPWZ) Stock Message Board - InvestorsHub




























































Support: 888-992-3836 | Newswire | Home | Log in












Boards


Stocks


Commodities


Forex


Cryptocurrency


The Lounge




Hot!


Breakout Boards


iHub My Stocks Activity


Ticker Buzz Cloud


Most Read


Most Posted


Most Followed Members


Recent News


Active Boards


Site Stats


New Boards


Cannabis Stocks




Tools


Data Tools >


Charts


Trader Alerts


Trades


Portfolio


Top Lists


Price & News Alerts


Commodities


Markets in 3D




NewsWire


More Tools >


Newsletters


My Image Gallery


Advanced Search


Videos


All News


Stock Screener


News Filter


Live Charts


Live News


Live Desktop


Forex Prices


Commodities


ETF Center


Educational Channel


Personal Finance Q&A






Streamer


Level 2


Follow Feed

























































Home
            >
            Boards
            >
            US Listed
            >
            Electronics and components
            >
            
Neah Power Systems, Inc. (NPWZ)



Add NPWZ Price Alert  
              
            Hide Sticky  
            Hide Intro










Moderator:
NPS2008, ShortonCash




Search This Board: 

2017
2016
2015
2014
2013
2012
2011
2010
2009
2008
2007
2006
2005
2004
2003+






Created: 12/1/2006 3:44:40 PM - 
                Followers:
                223
                - Board type:
                Free
                - Posts Today: 
                    0







        Neah Power Systems, Inc. (NPWZ) 22122 20th Ave SE Suite 161 Bothell, WA  98021 Phone 425-424-3324  Fax 425-483-8454  http://www.neahpower.com  Neah Power Systems, Inc. (NPWZ.OB) is a developer of long-lasting, efficient and safe power solutions for the military, transportation, and portable electronics applications. Neah uses a unique, patented and award winning, silicon-based design for its PowerchipTM and PowerPlay™ micro fuel cells that enable higher power densities, lower cost and compact form-factors. Previous awards include the 2012 ZINO Green finalist, the 2010 WTIA finalist, and 2010 Best of What’s NewTM Popular Science and other awards. The Company’s micro fuel cell system can run in aerobic and anaerobic modes.    Press Release: Neah Power Systems Wins U. S. Department of Energy Grant for Lithium Metal Battery 5 hours 8 minutes ago - DJNF Neah Power Systems Wins U. S. Department of Energy Grant for Lithium Metal Battery Battery Characterization by Argonne National Laboratory PR Newswire BOTHELL, Washington, August 23, 2016 BOTHELL, Washington, August 23, 2016 /PRNewswire/ -- Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ, NEAH POWER) an emerging leader in high density rechargeable lithium metal battery storage solutions for defense, commercial, and consumer applications, is pleased to announce that it won a grant from the U.S. Department of Energy through the Small Business Vouchers Pilot Program. http://energy.gov/technologytransitions/articles/energy-department-awards-43-new-business-laboratory-collaborations The NEAH PowerChip(R) Battery is the first battery to be made with high volume capable microchip manufacturing technology in semiconductor facilities (foundries) throughout the world. NEAH and numerous electrochemical engineers worldwide envision this new NEAH Battery architecture as transformative as it will change the way batteries are made, used and perform. The proprietary architecture of the PowerChip(R) Battery brings batteries into the microchip era, using the same manufacturing technologies that made television sets, cell phones, laptops and a variety of devices more compact with superior performance at lower cost. While initially targeted for consumer oriented applications, the battery technology could be used for automotive and defense applications as well. Dr. Chris D'Couto, President & CEO of NEAH said, "We look forward to working closely with Argonne National Laboratory, which is uniquely qualified to characterize the performance metrics associated with our unique battery architecture. This unique 3D architecture using lithium metal anodes enables more than five times the performance of batteries in production today. We at NEAH believe that the characterization of the battery by Argonne National Laboratory will further enhance the performance and manufacturability of the battery. It will also help us understand the most critical electrochemical reactions. This DOE/Argonne relationship will provide advanced technology learnings, leapfrogging what would be possible in a privately held laboratory. About the Small Business Vouchers Pilot The U.S. Department of Energy Small Business Vouchers Pilot is a collaborative, national effort that provides $20M for U.S. companies to work with National Laboratories. Vouchers focus on nine clean energy technologies. The SBV Pilot is an initiative of the U.S. Department of Energy, DOE's Office of Energy Efficiency & Renewable Energy, and participating DOE national lab   Markets Three Avenues for Commercialization  The shift from research entity to commercial status might be happening faster than most people might  realize.  The Company has three immediate areas of commercial focus. The company has entered into a  commercial arrangement with the Defense Research and Development Organization (DRDO) of India.  Shipments have already been made and the scale of this initial contract could reach $14 million. India is  looking at the PowerChip™ as a means of providing power to individual soldiers.  A second product area, aimed primarily for the retail markets, uses the company’s formic acid technology  as a variation on the PEM (Proton Exchange Membrane) process for its suite of battery recharging  products serving the portable electronic markets (BuzzBar™ Suite). The nature of the company’s design  and technology capabilities, however, gives it great flexibility in developing all manner of device  applications depending on the need and scope of the customer.  The Company has entered into memorandums of understanding (MOUs) to deploy the formic acid  technology into drones and other off-grid power solutions. The modular design would provide a lot of  flexibility to adapt the technology to these various applications which serve a variety of markets   http://evworld.com/focus.cfm?cid=240 By Bill Moore Dr. Chris D'Couto's company specializes in micro electric power systems: backup batteries that recharge your cellphone, tiny micro fuel cells, and now a reformer that converts formic acid, the key ingredient in ant venom, into hydrogen gas for running up to 5 kW fuel cells.   The public relations company wondered if I'd be interested in learning more about a company called Neah Power, based in Bothwell, Washington. Besides their micro fuel cell based BuzzBar and BuzzCell battery technology, they are working on a fuel cell system that runs off of formic acid. Formic acid? Before I agreed, I decided to first find out what formic acid is. It sounded dangerous. Turns out it is one of the more benign chemicals made up of two hydrogen atoms that bookend a carbon atom and two oxygen atoms. Its chemical designation is HCOOH. As Wikipedia noted, it is a natural chemical that ants produce for their venom. It's also used to preserve cattle silage, among its other industrial applications. Maybe best of all, it can be produced by a renewable process that recycles CO2 out of the atmosphere via plant biomass. Joan Slonczewski notes on her blog that the bacterium Acetobacterium woodii can be stimulated to convert dangerous carbon monoxide found in syngas into formic acid, a clear liquid that can be shipped and stored like any liquid fuel.  Using formic acid as a 'fuel' is where Neah Power comes into the picture. Besides their battery and micro fuel cell technology, the company last year acquired a firm that developed a reformer that rips apart the formic acid molecule, separating the two hydrogen atoms from the carbon and oxygen atoms. Those hydrogen atoms can then be fed into a fuel cell, including their own micro fuel cell to generate electric power. While the company is mainly focused on sub-kilowatt energy applications, it has developed some experimental units capable of outputting up to five kW. According to Dr. Chris D'Couto, Neah Power's CEO and the featured guest in the interview below, a five kilowatt hour fuel cell running off a tank of liquid formic acid would be configured to trickle charge an electric vehicle's battery, allowing it, like the gasoline engine generator in the BMW i3 REx, to offer extended range capability. Unlike the i3 REx, the only tailpipe emission would be water vapor and CO2.  Part 1 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uAzFoOW_Kqg Part 11 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2wsPkTqufdA   Published on Sep 16, 2014  Dr. Chris D'Couto's company specializes in micro electric power systems: backup batteries that recharge your cellphone, tiny micro fuel cells, and now a reformer that converts formic acid, the key ingredient in ant venom, into hydrogen gas for running up to 5 kW fuel cells. Part 2 of 3  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tayh3ZCi-D4 Part 111 Published on Sep 16, 2014  Dr. Chris D'Couto's company specializes in micro electric power systems: backup batteries that recharge your cellphone, tiny micro fuel cells, and now a reformer that converts formic acid, the key ingredient in ant venom, into hydrogen gas for running up to 5 kW fuel cells. Part 3 of 3  http://www.altenergymag.com/content.php?post_type=2338 Would a Neah Power Fuel Cell make a car more expensive, less expensive or the same? We like to think that a Neah Power Fuel Cell powered automobile would make a car less expensive on any number of measures including upfront cost, maintence costs, as well as total cost of ownership - however that would be an issue that would play out with the automotive manufacturers. How quickly would Neah be able to provide a fuel cell for say a number one auto company like Toyota? Neah Power has functional units in a variety of configurations that would be appropriate for automotive applications.  The balance of system and integration of the fuel cell into the electronics would be a joint development process with the identified automobile company.   As such, the successful approach is to characterize the fuel cell, have a specific application development program followed by production and product sales. Is there an intense manufacturing process involved in scaling up production of fuel cells for automotive applications? What kind of infrastructure is required and what kind of jobs would result? There is not an intense manufacturing process involved in scale up production of Neah Power Fuel Cells.  The scaling of production is a matter of electronics assembly and plastics injection molding similar to that of other electronic assemblies,  The value proposition that Neah Power can offer is higher energy densities and lower costs, offering a safe and effective solution and eliminating range and power issues associated with electric vehicles.  Neah Power becomes the enabler allow electric hybrid vehicles to go mainstream. Where is David Schmidt now... David Schmidt Mr. David Schmidt is a specialty materials and healthcare expert in the device and compound space who understands technologies, the applications, and builds businesses around them.        New Battery Has 5X More Energy Storage      Tuesday Posted Jun 14, 2016 at 4:23 PMUpdated Jun 14, 2016 at 8:00 PM   Share        (NewsUSA) - Sponsored News - In a world that values 24/7 connectivity, consumers are quickly learning that technology and the demands we place on it do not necessarily align. Think about it: technology requires power, but energy sources that are currently available can't possibly meet our needs. But what if they could? Imagine charging your cell phone or tablet weekly instead of daily or multiple times per day. Or driving an electric car for 1,000 miles instead of 260 before needing a recharge. That's the question that set Washington-based NEAH Power Systems Inc., on the path to finding a solution to power everything from your laptop to your tablet to your car. And the answer, says the company, may be closer than you think. At the heart of its products is the PowerChip Battery -- a dynamic new energy technology that has applications for consumer, commercial and automotive clients, to solve specific power requirements. Unlike other new-age battery concepts, the NEAH battery uses only standard battery components that are found in existing batteries used today -- just used differently. NEAH has 15 patents and 11 pending patent applications for, among others, the use of silicon substrates for fuel cells and batteries. In NEAH's PowerChip Battery, the company is building a rechargeable lithium battery in a 3-D architecture, using industry standard materials that provide high density (energy per unit weight or per unit volume), and can address the safety concerns typically seen in lithium -- ion batteries. NEAH is already building samples for field testing for its first customer. "We use our patented porous silicon 3D architectures to maximize power. This is the first truly new battery design in the past 50 years that is manufactureable by using older-generation computer chip manufacturing equipment. We have seen tremendous improvements with Moore's law in semiconductors, and this battery brings similar economies of scale to the battery landscape as well. We finally have a battery capable of delivering the portable and wearable power required to maximize the 24x7 needs of our interconnected life." says NEAH's CEO, Dr. Chris D'Couto, "Our company goal was to not only make batteries lighter, smaller and more powerful, but to make them more affordable than traditional batteries. People are tired of having to recharge their smart phones during their daily activities." Because of this cutting-edge technology, NEAH caught the attention of Tritente of Alexandria, Va., a Global Energy and Micro-Data Center company Tritente recently said it plans to deploy greater than $20 million of NEAH's PowerChip batteries in their projects in Africa, Europe and the Caribbean. By using NEAH's high-capacity energy generation and storage products, Tritente is able to bring the Artilium-Africa Micro-Data Center technologies to third-world population centers without a 24/7 grid system. "We chose NEAH because its next -generation energy storage system is powerful, cost effective and compatible with Tritente's $6 billion plan to deploy renewable energy in Africa and to bring the Artilium-Africa solution to every African country mobile operation, educational institution, government entities, and every cell phone holder," says Paul Delkaso, chief executive officer of Tritente and managing partner of Artilium-Africa. Currently, Artrillium-Africa expects to have between 10 to 20 data centers throughout each country throughout Africa. Most will be powered by renewable energy and will include NEAH's MicroChip next-generation energy storage system. While information about other products is currently on the www.neahpower.com website, due to various pending patent developments, the company is providing information on its battery within the constraints of a non-disclosure agreement, and interested parties are requested to contact the company at: info@neahpower.com.     Get the latest news.      Monday, 02 May 2016 Artilium to Expand in Africa in Partnership with Tritente Global Energy Group Artilium plc, the AIM quoted provider of innovative telecommunication software and solutions, announces that it is partnering with Tritente Global Energy Group to launch Artilium-Africa  in order to meet the demand for data and telecom services in the fastest growing continent in the world. The partnership is intended to bring Artilium’s 3G-4G mobile data service, cloud and innovative telecom services to the African market. Artilium Africa has started to acquire a value added services license in Ethiopia and is already in discussions with a number of potential customers for the provision of specific services in that country. Artilium’s disruptive micro-data center is an ideal solution to distribute telecom services throughout Africa where 1.3 billion people reside. Artilium already serves 50 telco brands such as T-Mobile and 10 million users in 20 countries with its services, but as yet none based in Africa.  Bart Weijermars, Chief Executive Officer of Artilium said: “Tritente is the perfect platform for Artilium to expand into Africa, which is in the early stages of the data and telecom revolution. Tritente is leading $6 billion of projects in renewable energy and power transmission in Sub Saharan Africa. They can open avenues in dozens of the 52 Sub Saharan countries”. Paul Delkaso, CEO of Tritente and Managing Partner of Artilium-Africa said: “Our plan is to bring the Artilium-Africa solution to every African country mobile operator, MVNO business, educational institution, Government entities and every cell phone holder”. Mr. Delkaso who is based in the Washington DC area is in Africa to establish operations in the first of six countries.   In contrast to the traditional large-scale mega data centers, which consume massive electricity, Artilium-Africa expects to have 10-20 times more energy-efficient, micro-data centers spread throughout each country. Most will be powered by renewable energy and include next-generation energy storage.    http://neahpower.com/author/awilliams/   Business update:   NEAH was invited to participate in the White House briefing on Feb 17. We have had various commercialization and capitalization discussions occur based on the networking at that event. As a direct result of attending the White House conference on Climate Change, we have been invited to attend three USTDA Reverse Trade Missions Focused on Energy Storage. The delegates are senior officials from South Africa, Jordon, Brazil, Colombia, India, the Philippines, Turkey and Vietnam.  I recently visited the United Arab Emirates (UAE) to explore certain licensing relationships to implement manufacturing and other partnership agreements. There is tremendous interest with the entities I met with to develop UAE into a renewable energy focused hub. We continue to explore and to finalize a mutually beneficial business relationship here.  We are in discussions with the Economic Development Authority of State in the USA regarding relocating to that State to enable their focus on renewable energy and battery storage. We expect this to get finalized in Q2 2016.  We continue to make progress on the previously announced MOU with a South Africa entity. We are in almost daily discussions with them, and are targeting an agreement with them by end of Q2 2016. This will provide a key production pathway for meeting our customer needs.  We have been negotiating a licensing agreement with an entity in India for the BuzzBar Suite and the Formira HOD products. India has been identified as one of the fastest growing markets for off-grid power, and this relationship can enable NEAH products to serve this region.  We have been negotiating a Formira HOD licensing with a group in Taiwan for the Greater China Region. Similar to India, the demand for off-grid power is significant, and continuing to grow in this region. This licensee partner is expected to visit us in the near future which will enable us to complete the anticipated transaction.  Our discussions with the DRDO are ongoing, and we expect to schedule a visit in Q2 2016.  We plan to submit for two separate grants for certain DOE funding with a National Laboratory in the US during the next 30 days.  Finally, the PowerChip® Battery continues to get tremendous interest from consumers and commercial entities. We are negotiating preliminary orders for this product, and due to the outsourced manufacturing model, we believe we can manufacture this very capital efficiently  While our capitalization situation is very challenging, the management is diligently working to complete various capitalization and commercialization activities that will help unlock the potential of the Company. We are pursuing licensing agreements initially since that would enable licensee partners to create manufacturing infrastructure to meet their needs but also the needs of NEAH.   Thank you for your continued support, and best regards,   Chris D’Couto  President & CEO     Analyst Reports The following Analyst Reports are available in PDF format: Zacks Equity Research – March 10, 2010 Consilium Global Research – September 9, 2014 Consilium Global Research – March 18, 2015 SEETHRU EQUITY – May 28, 2015 http://neahpower.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/06/zacks-equity-research_3-10-2015.pdf  http://neahpower.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/06/consilium-global-research_9-10-2014.pdf  http://neahpower.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/06/consilium-global-research_3-18-2015.pdf  http://neahpower.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/06/seethru-equity_5-28-2015.pdf  http://neahpower.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/08/NPWZ-August-5-2015.pdf  Oh, in case you missed it:   http://m.leavenworthtimes.com/news/20160614/new-battery-has-5x-more-energy-storage  about 7:44 into the video a source that is not Neah Power confirms Partnership  NICE !!! Artilium PLC on London stock exchange is part of the group  It is at approx 7:44    NEAH may generate in excess of $20 million in revenues from this partnership. The significance of this joint venture is that NEAH's PowerChip batteries offer six times more power than traditional batteries. In addition, with this new technology, NEAH says jobs will be created in the U.S., while at the same time, providing a better quality of life in Africa. "We chose NEAH because their next-generation energy storage system is powerful, cost effective and compatible with Tritente's $6 billion plan to deploy renewable energy in Africa and to bring the Artilium-Africa solution to every African mobile operation, educational institution, government entities and every cell phone holder," said Paul Delkaso, chief executive officer of Tritente and managing partner of Artilium-Africa.   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DHrUkpWxpNA ; about 7:44 into the video a source that is not Neah Power confirms Partnership    Last Two Patent Approvals 1/28/16 - 20160028273 - Method and system for simultaneously charging an energy storage device from multiple energy input devices  A system for simultaneously charging an energy storage device from multiple energy input devices includes energy input devices in the form of solar and non-solar modules and an energy storage device in the form of a rechargeable battery, which is part of an energy storage module. A first solar module...  Inventors: Derek Reiman, Chris D'couto, Saroj Sahu (Neah Power Systems, Inc.)    Saroj Sahu  Battery Engineering at Apple  Fremont, California Renewables & Environment        old footnote from 2009 Neah Power Systems CEO On Energy Storage Panel  ( now they have a patent together, and Saroj works at Battery Engineering at Apple)  August 4, 2009 (FinancialWire) — Neah Power Systems, Inc.,  (OTCBB: NPWZ), a developer of fuel cells for the military and portable electronic devices, announced  that Dr. Chris D’Couto, the company’s CEO, has been invited by the U.S.-India Business Council (www.usibc.com) Energy, Environment & Enterprise Executive Committee to participate, on August 6th 2009, as a panelist on the topic of ‘Large-Scale Electricity Storage in India’s Renewable Power Sector, along with panelist Saroj Sahu, CTO and Founder of Deeya Energy, with a market overview by McKinsey and company.     Sean Huff - Related organizations: Neah Power Systems, Inc. patents   01/28/16 - 20160028098 - Passive proton exchange membrane fuel cell  A passive-delivery fuel cell system an anode with a fuel flow channel extending along the body and fluidly connecting the inlet to the outlet, wherein a volume of the flow channel per unit length of the anode body increases along the length of the body towards the second end, a...  Inventors: Tsali Cross, Chris D'couto, Sean Huff, Derek Reiman (Neah Power Systems, Inc.)       Neah Power Systems Wins U. S. Department of Energy Grant for Lithium Metal Battery Battery Characterization by Argonne National Laboratory PR Newswire BOTHELL, Washington, August 23, 2016 BOTHELL, Washington, August 23, 2016 /PRNewswire/ -- Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB: NPWZ, NEAH POWER) an emerging leader in high density rechargeable lithium metal battery storage solutions for defense, commercial, and consumer applications, is pleased to announce that it won a grant from the U.S. Department of Energy through the Small Business Vouchers Pilot Program. http://energy.gov/technologytransitions/articles/energy-department-awards-43-new-business-laboratory-collaborations The NEAH PowerChip(R) Battery is the first battery to be made with high volume capable microchip manufacturing technology in semiconductor facilities (foundries) throughout the world. NEAH and numerous electrochemical engineers worldwide envision this new NEAH Battery architecture as transformative as it will change the way batteries are made, used and perform. The proprietary architecture of the PowerChip(R) Battery brings batteries into the microchip era, using the same manufacturing technologies that made television sets, cell phones, laptops and a variety of devices more compact with superior performance at lower cost. While initially targeted for consumer oriented applications, the battery technology could be used for automotive and defense applications as well. Dr. Chris D'Couto, President & CEO of NEAH said, "We look forward to working closely with Argonne National Laboratory, which is uniquely qualified to characterize the performance metrics associated with our unique battery architecture. This unique 3D architecture using lithium metal anodes enables more than five times the performance of batteries in production today. We at NEAH believe that the characterization of the battery by Argonne National Laboratory will further enhance the performance and manufacturability of the battery. It will also help us understand the most critical electrochemical reactions. This DOE/Argonne relationship will provide advanced technology learnings, leapfrogging what would be possible in a privately held laboratory. About the Small Business Vouchers Pilot The U.S. Department of Energy Small Business Vouchers Pilot is a collaborative, national effort that provides $20M for U.S. companies to work with National Laboratories. Vouchers focus on nine clean energy technologies. The SBV Pilot is an initiative of the U.S. Department of Energy, DOE's Office of Energy Efficiency & Renewable Energy, and participating DOE national lab    http://www.heraldnet.com/business/grant-to-give-boost-to-battery-developed-by-neah-power/ Grant to give boost to battery developed by Neah Power   Neah Power Systems was chosen by the U.S. Department of Energy to work with Argonne National Laboratory to increase the capacity and manufacturability of its rechargeable lithium-metal battery. The relationship will help the company’s technology leapfrog, said Chris D’Couto, Neah Power’s president and CEO. Neah Power will work with the laboratory near Chicago for a year. The laboratory time and expertise is valued at $300,000. Neah Power was based in Bothell, but is relocating to Edmonds. The batteries are manfuctured in Beaverton, Oregon. The company is developing a high-density, rechargeable lithium metal battery called Neah PowerChip Battery for defense, commercial and consumer uses. The unique architecture using lithium metal and porous silicon is making the battery five times more powerful than batteries in production today, D’Couto said. Theoretical modeling of the battery shows that it should be producing even more energy storage and output than it already does, D’Couto said. With assistance of the national laboratory, Neah Power hopes to identify the changes that need to be made so the practical application matches up with the theoretical modeling. There’s long been a search to build a better battery that can store and produce more energy and “live forever and cost nothing,” said Ira Bloom, senior chemist and group leader at Argonne National Laboratory. He pointed to the carbon zinc batteries at hardware stores, noting how they come in many shapes and sizes. He said changing the battery’s chemistery also changes everything. “It’s a scientific discipline, but how you make it can be an art form,” Bloom said. “Once you figure out how to produce it, it’s very re-produceable.” He said he’s unfamiliar with Neah’s PowerChip, but looks forward to working on it. “It presents an interesting challenge, no question about it,” Bloom said. “I hope everybody learns from this project.” The PowerChip Battery is already generating interest. Neah Power has a deal with Santa Rosa, California,-firm Liquid Image to produce 100 batteries for wearable police body cameras. Those batteries are expected to hold enough charge for 13 hours instead of four hours with current standard rechargeable batteries, D’Couto said. If testing is successful, Liquid Image wants to buy 200,000 PowerChip Batteries. This type of battery technology could also be used for the increasing number of electric vehicles, D’Couto said. And that could extend the range for electric cars by hundreds of miles. The design uses the same manufacturing technologies that made television sets, cell phones and laptops more compact and capable, D’Couto said. So it could be manufactured at existing semiconductor foundries around the world.  Company overview from D'Cuto.  Dr. Chris D’Couto was also interviewed by Money TV®, which can be seen here from nine months ago.  https://vimeo.com/145571430   The PowerChip Battery is already generating interest.  Neah Power has a deal with Santa Rosa, California,-firm Liquid Image to produce 100 batteries for wearable police body cameras. Those batteries are expected to hold enough charge for 13 hours instead of four hours with current standard rechargeable batteries, D’Couto said.  If testing is successful, Liquid Image wants to buy 200,000 PowerChip Batteries.  This type of battery technology could also be used for the increasing number of electric vehicles, D’Couto said. And that could extend the range for electric cars by hundreds of miles.  The design uses the same manufacturing technologies that made television sets, cell phones and laptops more compact and capable, D’Couto said.  http://www.heraldnet.com/business/grant-to-give-boost-to-battery-developed-by-neah-power/     Neah Power Systems Retweeted   Streetwise Reports @SWReports  Neah Power has a Better Battery: http://ow.ly/hpx2304tloX   $NPWZ @neahpowerinc #batteries #ev #green #energy #gigafactory #lithium    View image on Twitter 23h   Neah Power Systems @neahpowerinc   We certainly feel we do.  http://www.streetwisereports.com/pub/na/neah-power-has-a-better-mousetrap-battery …      http://10times.com/fuel-cell-expo Fuel Cell Expo is a 3 day event being held from 1st March to the 3rd March 2017 at the Tokyo Big Sight in Tokyo, Japan. This event showcases products like Electrolytes/Ion Exchange Membranes Gas Diff usion Layers (GDL) Separators, Single Cell Test Equipment Power Load Equipment Gas Analysis Equipment Flow Meters/Dew-point Hygrometers / Thermometers / Manometers Other Calibration Devices/Detection Devices Cell Inspection Equipment etc. in the Petroleum, Oil & Gas industry.  Cyril Chiang World's first hydrogen reformer using formic acid at Neah Power Systems       I543427 [201501396] 2016/07/21 103116767 Charging system containing a fuel cell and battery with materials and methods of assembly for a fuel cell utilizing an anionic exchange membrane and fuel cell cartridge designs     New Neah Patent.....in Tiawian http://twpat6.tipo.gov.tw/tipotwoc/                                        This is a 1000X magnified photograph of a cross-section of a single micro battery. A typical consumer device would have a few million of these and store 5X more energy than traditional batteries.   Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTC: NPWZ) an emerging leader in high density rechargeable lithium metal battery storage solutions for defense, commercial, and consumer applications, is pleased to announce that it won a grant from the U.S. Department of Energy through the Small Business Vouchers Pilot Program. http://energy.gov/technologytransitions/articles/energy-department-awards-43-new-business-laboratory-collaborations The NEAH PowerChip® Battery is the first battery to be made with high volume capable microchip manufacturing technology in semiconductor facilities (foundries) throughout the world. NEAH and numerous electrochemical engineers worldwide envision this new NEAH Battery architecture as transformative as it will change the way batteries are made, used and perform. The proprietary architecture of the PowerChip® Battery brings batteries into the microchip era, using the same manufacturing technologies that made television sets, cell phones, laptops and a variety of devices more compact with superior performance at lower cost. While initially targeted for consumer oriented applications, the battery technology could be used for automotive and defense applications as well. Read the full NPWZ Press Release at: http://financialnewsmedia.com/profiles/npwz.html Dr. Chris D'Couto, President & CEO of NEAH said, "We look forward to working closely with Argonne National Laboratory, which is uniquely qualified to characterize the performance metrics associated with our unique battery architecture. This unique 3D architecture using lithium metal anodes enables more than five times the performance of batteries in production today.  We at NEAH believe that the characterization of the battery by Argonne National Laboratory will further enhance the performance and manufacturability of the battery. It will also help us understand the most critical electrochemical reactions. This DOE/Argonne relationship will provide advanced technology learnings, leapfrogging what would be possible in a privately held laboratory.    http://defenseinnovation.us/partner/showcase/participants.html   Neah Power -----Org Type: Early-stage Startup (Seed)  TECHNOLOGY:  High energy density lithium metal battery?  AFFILIATION: Neah Power Systems, Edmonds, Washington, United States  TECHNOLOGY SUMMARY  Track: Energy & Resilience  Area: Soldier Technologies  Tech Readiness: TRL 4   Tech Brief: A lithium metal battery built using computer chip manufacturing technologies. This provides a low cost, high energy density, long lifetime battery. Applicable for dismounted soldier to grid scale. This would reduce the payload (weight) for different missions.   FIGURES OF MERIT   Value Proposition: The high volumetric and gravimetric energy density battery, manufacturable at very low cost, can lead to weight reduction for dismounted soldier backpacks, to larger stationary applications. For integrated applications, the mission endurance can be significantly increased by the use of the PowerChip battery.   SHOWCASE SUMMARY   Org Type: Early-stage Startup (Seed)   http://www.s4worldwide.com/sentry-drone-surveillance SENTRYDRONE UAS CAPABILITIES  https://d3ciwvs59ifrt8.cloudfront.net/6867dc99-e989-4019-ad0d-2b574424f2b1/558abb72-5684-4ccc-ab17-9b4f91fcf794.pdf ? Modular Camera Integration • 1x to 7x zoom up to 30x zoom o Zoom features provides safe operation of UAS from distance • 4k video resolution, up to 120 fps capture, high resolution digital stills • Lidar and Infrared for beyond visual spectrum capture o Useful in day or night and dense atmosphere ? Object Avoidance and Motion Detection • Provides accurate navigation within centimeters without use of GPS • Complete 360° Object Avoidance with accurate navigation up to 60 feet without GPS. ? Triple Redundancy GPS and Dual IMU’s • Provides accurate navigation even around Metal and Electromagnetic structures • Precise indoor flights up to 60 feet in height with no GPS. ? Precise Repeatable Missioned Planned Flights • Control of camera and Data Collection by two person crew • Data collection thru multiple devices including PC, Mobile Devices and Radio Control • Full or *Semi-Autonomous flights (*Semi-Autonomous flight meets current FAA Part 107) ? Secured Radio and Flight Sensor Protocols • Prevents hacking of UAS by unauthorized personnel ? Data Collection • Use of 3D Cloud Point Geo-referenced Maps, Textured Modeling, Orthomosaic, Photo-grammetry, NDVI Map, Stereographic Maps, Thermal Modeling, Volumetric Measuring, videography and photography. ? Continuous Flight • UAS management solution for continuous uninterrupted flight missions • UAS of various energy sources to extend flight times • Integrated Neah Power battery for extended, multiple Hour flight times.     http://neahpower.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/06/consilium-global-research_3-18-2015.pdf We offer the following summary of the company’s IP in combination with some other value elements as a reasonable compendium to measure the company’s latent value. Table 8 This sum of the parts approach produces a present value of all of the company’s intellectual assets and tax loss carry-forwards of $117.7 million. In our second, more practical approach, we estimated the company’s likely revenue progression over the next two years and calculated a revenue achievement of $14.5 million which, when a 3x revenue multiple is applied, produces a value of approximately $43.5 million which, discounted at a 15% annual discount rate over two years produces a base value of $32.9 million. Add in the tax loss carry-forwards estimated value of $14 million and a total value of $46.9 million can be calculated. Currently the company is trading with an enterprise value of about $6 million. The steep discount from our valuation calculations is almost certainly attributed to the enduring inability of the company to generate revenues and the generally disappointing history of fuel cell investments. Investing at this time before real commercial corroboration takes place has its obvious risks, but it will not take long to respond positively if any of the pending customer discussions translate to real material engagements. It is understandable, however, why the market is taking a “show me” attitude towards this company and its stock  This was before the battery design in 2015.... its much more now...   Website: http:wwww.neahpower.com    










            NPWZ
        



            Current Price
        



            Volume:
        







            Bid
        

            Ask
        

            Day's Range
        















NPWZ Detailed Quote









1D1M2M3M6M1Y2Y3Y5Y






















Post New Msg


Follow Board


My Stocks (124)


Hide Intro


View Posters


NPWZ Poststream


Bans (1)


Hide Quote


Filter Disabled









PostSubject< Older


#23180
                                 

Given the last known travel plans of the

ShortonCash
05/09/17 01:15:09 PM


#23819
                                 
                            
HOD Formira on demand trademark will be published

ShortonCash
07/21/17 02:01:11 PM


#23818
                                 
                            
What is with the lull?

Cherub
07/21/17 01:40:50 PM


#23817
                                 
                            
something is coming.

NPS2008
07/21/17 01:12:40 PM


#23815
                                 
                            
This post from awhile back now makes sense...Virginia

ShortonCash
07/20/17 05:17:27 PM


#23814
                                 
                            
 0.0013	 0.0003   30.00% 47,513,021 	14.6M ten day

ShortonCash
07/20/17 04:04:13 PM


#23813
                                 
                            
back to .001.. then up again is my guess.

dhe777
07/20/17 04:01:06 PM


#23812
                                 
                            
https://angel.co/chenghung
That was a good find, hadn't seen that one.

Rocinante
07/20/17 02:34:15 PM


#23811
                                 
                            
something.. who knows. I guess we'll find out

NPS2008
07/20/17 02:30:09 PM


#23810
                                 
                            
ABU Dhabi Link?

ShortonCash
07/20/17 02:20:05 PM


#23809
                                 
                            
Doesn't look like we will blow through 12's today.

mofran
07/20/17 02:19:27 PM


#23808
                                 
                            
Yes what's up with this ?

mofran
07/20/17 01:54:45 PM


#23807
                                 
                            
go neah tell you what I sold a

bullrunner7
07/20/17 01:40:56 PM


#23806
                                 
                            
currently an advisor to Neah Power Systems

ShortonCash
07/20/17 01:36:57 PM


#23805
                                 
                            
That's great news I'm guna holds npwz to

Smittytnt
07/20/17 12:56:53 PM


#23804
                                 
                            
Don't know... could be anyone of the things

ShortonCash
07/20/17 12:50:39 PM


#23803
                                 
                            
 0.0012	 0.0002   20.00%  34,411,000 

ShortonCash
07/20/17 12:36:59 PM


#23802
                                 
                            
What's moving NPWZ I've been long for a

Smittytnt
07/20/17 12:36:31 PM


#23801
                                 
                            
Wonder what became of the this and the

ShortonCash
07/20/17 12:32:22 PM


#23800
                                 
                            
there they go.. someone prob knows something.

NPS2008
07/20/17 12:19:01 PM


#23799
                                 
                            
where is this listed?

NPS2008
07/20/17 12:09:14 PM


#23798
                                 
                            
 0.0011	 0.0001   10.00%   21,415,000

ShortonCash
07/20/17 12:04:41 PM


#23796
                                 
                            
Newly listed Advisor to Neah Power Systems..

ShortonCash
07/20/17 12:00:53 PM


#23795
                                 
                            
Neah Power Systems another Dubai connection....wonder if the

ShortonCash
07/20/17 10:46:46 AM


#23794
                                 
                            
0.001	 0.00   0.00%	--	18,172,000 14.6M ten day average....

ShortonCash
07/20/17 10:38:47 AM


#23793
                                 
                            
Something is going on for sure..

NPS2008
07/20/17 10:17:08 AM


#23792
                                 
                            
My Main issue with it is that after

Bill_ENG
07/20/17 09:42:25 AM


#23791
                                 
                            
this is true as i doubt they would

nojay
07/20/17 12:51:31 AM


#23790
                                 
                            
Yes all those good things happen after an

Bill_ENG
07/19/17 07:33:09 PM


#23789
                                 
                            
Once again..

Bill_ENG
07/19/17 07:21:00 PM


#23788
                                 
                            
Umm he said what the Doc said is

nojay
07/19/17 03:43:44 PM


#23787
                                 
                            
No crap they are not the same nobody

nojay
07/19/17 03:33:44 PM


#23786
                                 
                            
This is now a non-SEC registered stock. The

kennypooh
07/19/17 12:34:45 PM


#23785
                                 
                            
I still wonder why all the volume the

NPS2008
07/19/17 11:57:16 AM


#23783
                                 
                            
0.0009	 0.00   0.00%	4,383,699

ShortonCash
07/19/17 09:58:45 AM


#23782
                                 
                            
Repurposed Electronic Foundry Manufacturing was what the grant

ShortonCash
07/19/17 09:50:27 AM


#23781
                                 
                            
not really.. i'm not sure what stock you

NPS2008
07/19/17 09:46:24 AM


#23780
                                 
                            
 0.001	 0.0001   11.11%   10,000

ShortonCash
07/19/17 09:37:54 AM


#23779
                                 
                            
Nojay,
Bill is completely right.... If a lab assists

Investor1248
07/19/17 05:59:40 AM


#23778
                                 
                            
You don't understand the SBV process and the

Bill_ENG
07/18/17 08:27:13 PM


#23777
                                 
                            
Tape painting is cheap at these prices. Plus

wealthy farmer
07/18/17 07:15:44 PM


#23776
                                 
                            
You need to learn how to comprehend

nojay
07/18/17 06:30:06 PM


#23775
                                 
                            
Even a broken clock is right twice a day.

Bill_ENG
07/18/17 06:23:18 PM


#23774
                                 
                            
Read the first sentence and the last sentence

Bill_ENG
07/18/17 06:04:55 PM


#23773
                                 
                            
15.2 Million at .001    2.5

dhe777
07/18/17 05:15:20 PM


#23772
                                 
                            
Can the trend be due to the bus....?

ShortonCash
07/18/17 04:52:46 PM


#23771
                                 
                            
 0.001	 0.0004   66.67%   48,405,652

ShortonCash
07/18/17 04:00:16 PM


#23770
                                 
                            
It would not be smart to flip at

dhe777
07/18/17 03:53:15 PM


#23769
                                 
                            
and now you can flip it at .0009

NPS2008
07/18/17 03:43:46 PM


#23768
                                 
                            
Bought back in at .0007

dhe777
07/18/17 03:33:20 PM


#23767
                                 
                            
 0.0009	 0.0003   50.00%   30,217,258

ShortonCash
07/18/17 03:32:46 PM

PostSubject< Older
















Post New Msg


Follow Board


My Stocks (124)


Hide Intro


View Posters


NPWZ Poststream


Bans (1)


Hide Quote


Filter Disabled















            ©
            2017
            InvestorsHub.Com, Inc.
        





About

Investor Relations


About Us


Terms of Service


Privacy Policy


Advertise With Us


Data Accreditations


Disclaimer




Help

FAQ


Handbook


Q&A Forum


Contact Us


Tutorials




Educational

Educational Channel


Stock Market 101


Educational Videos


Investor Help Forum


Personal Finance Q&A




More

Corporate Solutions


iHub on Facebook


iHub on Twitter


iHub iPhone/iPad App


iHub Android App


iHub BlackBerry App


iHub NewsWire






            You are
            Guest
            on
            WEB8
        


























 





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













neah power systems inc, Shopping.net











































Top Category Matches



> Rechargeable & Replacemen...




> Network Hub & Switches




> UPS & Power Adapters




> Other Fitness Equipment




> Other Holiday Decor




> Audio / Video Cables & Ad...




> Computer Cables & Adapter...




> Miscellaneous Non-Fiction Boo...




> Electrical Supplies




> Bridges & Routers




> Power Supplies




> Car Audio / Video Accessories




> Law Books




> Audio & Video Accessories




> Boats, Kayaks & Boating E...




> Miscellaneous Automotive




> Miscellaneous Home & Gard...




> Swimming Pools & Spas



see all categories













Price



Price must be rounded to nearest dollar
$

to $







Free Shipping







Genre







Action Adventure

17






Fighting

8



 more












Color







Black

8



 more












Motherboard Form Factor







ATX

9



 more












Networking Type







Ethernet

33



 more












Publisher







Activision

17



 more












Networking Connection Type







Ethernet

53






Gigabit Ethernet

17






Fast Ethernet

12






USB

10






IEEE 802.3af

8






IEEE 802

8



 more












Switching Protocol







Ethernet

29



 more












RAM Type







SDRAM

15



 more












Hard Drive Interface Type







Ultra DMA/ATA-66

8



 more












Platform







PC

15



 more















Shop by Department



Appliances




Automotive




Babies & Kids




Clothing & Accessories




Computers & Software




DVDs & Videos




Electronics




Gifts, Flowers & Food




Health & Beauty Supplies




Home & Garden




Jewelry




Musical Instruments & Accessories




Office Supplies




Other Products




Pet Supplies




Sports Equipment & Outdoor Gear




Toys




Video Games




 See more































Royal Sovereign Int'l Inc 0.9 Cu. Ft. 1000...
$447.60
$248.51














Power Systems 61916 CardioBarbell - 10 Set Rack...

$294.93














Power-Turn Lateral Rotation Mattress System w/...

$5,600.37














Power-Turn Lateral Rotation Mattress System w/...

$5,230.77













Power Systems 80187 Club Foam Roller Cart

$208.01













Power Systems 91205 4 lbs VersaBar 4 ft....

$21.45













ROHO, Inc. SAHYOVMATT109 HybridSelect Mattress...

$3,259.50













Cisco CP-PWR-7925G-NA 7925G AC Power Supply for...

$31.99













Hubbell Wiring Systems S1SPTRAC System One...
$80.91
$58.50













Generac Power Systems Inc 6346 Power Inlet Box...
$94.99
$89.80













Hubbell Wiring Systems S1SPMAX System One Siemon...
$99.12
$49.50













Hubbell Wiring Systems S1SPEXT2 System One...
$70.97
$44.50













ABLEGRID AC / DC Adapter For RCA Visys...

$21.88













PwrON AC to DC Adapter For Topcon GRS-1 GRS-I...

$35.99













Oncore Power Systems Inc. Pc6-01F-Blk-S Cat6...
$11.02
$4.32













Generac Power Systems Inc. Oil Heater Kit

$108.99













Coleman Cable Systems Inc. 041602 1500J 7 Out...
$28.14
$25.32













PwrON New AC TO DC Adapter For Sys Technology...

$28.99













ABLEGRID AC/DC Adapter For Sys Technology Inc...

$24.88













ABLEGRID 48V Global AC / DC Adapter For Cisco...

$7.98













Chief X-large Fusion Video Conferencing Cart...

$1,999.99













"CISCO PWR-IE3000-AC Expansion Power...

$261.28













"NComputing L300 Virtual Thin Client System...

$179.99













"CISCO PWR-3900-AC 3925/3945 AC Power...

$382.87













"CISCO PWR-60W-AC 880 Series AC Power...

$29.99












1


2


3


4


5


6


7


8


9


10


>






































Privacy


Terms of Service


Contact Us


Shopping.net is compensated by these merchants. Payment is one of several factors used to rank these results. Tax and shipping costs are estimates.
© 2017 IAC Publishing, LLC




























Neah Power Systems | leading innovator of unique energy solutions

















































 






Neah Power Systems is a leading innovator of unique energy solutions.
Neah Power Systems, Inc. (OTCBB:NPWZ) is a developer of innovative, long-lasting, efficient and safe power solutions for the military, transportation, and portable electronics applications. Neah uses a unique, patented and award winning, silicon-based design for its Powerchip(R) technology that enable higher power densities, air and non-air operation, lower cost and compact form-factors. Neah uses patent pending low cost, differentiated technology for its BuzzBar™  and BuzzCell™ micro fuel cells for its consumer oriented products.

Award Winning Technology
Neah Power’s ideas and products have been awarded; 2012 ZINO Green finalist, 2010 WTIA finalist, and 2010 Best of What’s New™ Popular Science, Office of Naval Research Award, Red Herring Top 100 Innovators Winner, NIST Award and more.
> Learn more about Products here.
Growing World-Wide Markets
Neah Power develops unique and disruptive new technologies for growing world-wide opportunities including the Military, First Responders, Logistics and Consumer Electronic and Mobile markets.
> Learn more about Markets here.







 
Search



Financial Update New Proxy Form Def 14A
  Recent News 

NEAH POWER SYSTEMS WINS U. S. Department of Energy grant for lithium metal battery
August 23, 2016


NEAH POWER SYSTEMS Battery Proposal Selected As Semi-Finalist
July 8, 2016


NEAH POWER SYSTEMS SUBMITS PROPOSAL FOR DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY FUNDING
June 7, 2016


NEAH Power systems ISSUES Letter to Shareholders – March 2016
March 16, 2016


NEAH POWER SYSTEMS INVITED TO WHITE HOUSE BRIEFING
February 16, 2016


 Neah on Twitter Tweets by @neahpowerinc

 

















 























































Neah Power Systems - 22122 20th Ave SE, Bothell, WA - Phone Number - Yelp

  





















                        Skip to Search Form
                    zqbutyfurrre



                        Skip to Navigation
                    



                        Skip to Page Content
                    








Yelp











Find












Near
















                            Cancel
    









Search




































                    Sign Up
    



            Log In
        

























                            Login
    



                            Sign Up
    










About Me
            
















Talk
            




































            Restaurants

        











            Nightlife

        











            Home Services

                












                Air Conditioning & Heating
        





                Contractors
        





                Electricians
        





                Home Cleaners
        





                Landscapers
        





                Locksmiths
        





                Movers
        





                Painters
        





                Plumbers
        














            Write a Review

        






            Events

        






            Talk

        







            Log In
        











 











22122 20th Ave SESte 161Bothell, WA 98021


        (425) 424-3324
    






            Neah Power Systems
        






Unclaimed
        


This business has not yet been claimed by the owner or a representative.
Claim this business to view business statistics, receive messages from prospective customers, and respond to reviews.









        Add
        , Opens a popup

Add categories













Write a Review
    







            Add Photo
    






Share
, Opens a popup







Bookmark
, Opens a popup





















Get directions













































Swap start/end points
Start from












Start from
Swap start/end points











Neah Power Systems


        22122 20th Ave SE, Bothell, WA 98021
    




Get directions


























Edit




        22122 20th Ave SESte 161Bothell, WA 98021
    










Get Directions








Phone number

        (425) 424-3324
    






 
Business website
neahpower.com









Send to your Phone











Is this your business?
Respond to reviews and customer messages.Claiming is free, and only takes a minute.
Claim This Business

























Ask the Community


                Yelp users haven’t asked any questions yet about Neah Power Systems.
            
Ask a Question













Rating



1 (Eek! Methinks not.)



2 (Meh. I've experienced better.)



3 (A-OK.)



4 (Yay! I'm a fan.)



5 (Woohoo! As good as it gets!)






                    Hey there trendsetter! You could be the first review for Neah Power Systems.
                





Is this your business?






Once you’ve claimed, you can:

Immediately update business information
Respond to reviews and customer messages
See the customer leads your business page generates
Monitor how many people view your business page

Claim This Business









Business info summary











Edit business info








            Hours
        





Add business hours
    


People also viewed












University of Washington Bothell






            6 reviews
    









Browse nearby








Restaurants









Nightlife









Shopping









Show all











Rating Details





                    5 stars
                





0






                    4 stars
                





0






                    3 stars
                





0






                    2 stars
                





0






                    1 star
                





0





We calculate the overall star rating using only reviews that our automated software currently recommends. Learn more.




Text to Phone












                    Oops, looks like something’s wrong. Try again!
                


×














                    Are you a human? Please complete the bot challenge below.
                


×














Sent! Check your phone to view the link now!
                


×


















Neah Power Systems



Bothell, WA




Text a link to your phone so you can quickly get directions, see photos, and read reviews on the go!





+1






















Text Link


                            Your carrier’s rates may apply
                        

















About


About Yelp


Order Food on Eat24


Careers


Press


Investor Relations


Content Guidelines


Terms of Service


Privacy Policy


Ad Choices






Discover


The Local Yelp


Yelp Blog


Support


Yelp Mobile


Developers


RSS






Yelp for Business Owners


Claim your Business Page


Advertise on Yelp


Online Ordering from Eat24


Yelp Reservations


Business Success Stories


Business Support


Yelp Blog for Business Owners







Languages


















                Bahasa Malaysia (Malaysia)
        







                Čeština (Česká republika)
        







                Dansk (Danmark)
        







                Deutsch (Deutschland)
        





                Deutsch (Schweiz)
        





                Deutsch (Österreich)
        







                English (Australia)
        





                English (Belgium)
        





                English (Canada)
        





                English (Hong Kong)
        





                English (Malaysia)
        





                English (New Zealand)
        





                English (Philippines)
        





                English (Republic of Ireland)
        





                English (Singapore)
        





                English (Switzerland)
        





                English (United Kingdom)
        





                English (United States)
        







                Español (Argentina)
        





                Español (Chile)
        





                Español (España)
        





                Español (México)
        







                Filipino (Pilipinas)
        







                Français (Belgique)
        





                Français (Canada)
        





                Français (France)
        





                Français (Suisse)
        







                Italiano (Italia)
        





                Italiano (Svizzera)
        







                Nederlands (België)
        





                Nederlands (Nederland)
        







                Norsk (Norge)
        







                Polski (Polska)
        







                Português (Brasil)
        





                Português (Portugal)
        







                Suomi (Suomi)
        







                Svenska (Finland)
        





                Svenska (Sverige)
        







                Türkçe (Türkiye)
        







                日本語 (日本)
        







                繁體中文 (台灣)
        





                繁體中文 (香港)
        









Countries


















                Argentina
        







                Australia
        







                Austria
        







                Belgium
        







                Brazil
        







                Canada
        







                Chile
        







                Czech Republic
        







                Denmark
        







                Finland
        







                France
        







                Germany
        







                Hong Kong
        







                Italy
        







                Japan
        







                Malaysia
        







                Mexico
        







                New Zealand
        







                Norway
        







                Philippines
        







                Poland
        







                Portugal
        







                Republic of Ireland
        







                Singapore
        







                Spain
        







                Sweden
        







                Switzerland
        







                Taiwan
        







                The Netherlands
        







                Turkey
        







                United Kingdom
        







                United States
        













Site Map

Atlanta
Austin
Boston
Chicago
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Honolulu
Houston
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Portland
Sacramento
San Diego
San Francisco
San Jose
Seattle
Washington, DC
More Cities






About


Blog


Support


Terms





            Copyright © 2004–2017 Yelp Inc. Yelp, ,  and related marks are registered trademarks of Yelp.
    


















































Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


